1. The Wallerian degeneration occurring in peripheral nerves by incubation in Ringer solution and serum does not occur in plasma. 2. Peripheral nerves incubated in plasma give rise to no growth. The same is true of peripheral nerves in a Wallerian degeneration up to the 4th day. 3. Peripheral nerves in Wallerian degeneration from the 5th day give rise to a growth of the syncytium of Schwann. In cultures from later stages there is a progressive growth of the same structure. It is evident that the proliferation of the cells of Schwann is directly produced by the degeneration of the axis cylinder and its myelin sheath. 4. In no case was growth of axis cylinders observed. 5. The growth of the syncytium of Schwann from degenerating nerves affords a basis for an anatomical conception of the centrifugal orientation of growing axis cylinders in regeneration. 6. Morphologically there is a striking resemblance between the syncytium of Schwann and neuroglia growing in plasma.
The explanation of the wide-spread changes in the embryo after grafting with adult organs offers a problem of considerable interest. Just what factors are responsible for them we are unprepared to say. They occur only after the grafting of certain adult homologous organs and are absent after grafting with such tissues as the chicken sarcoma, adult muscles, bone, and cartilage. Likewise no systemic changes have been observed after grafting of various tissues from foreign species, such as rat and mouse embryos, rat and mouse tumors of various sorts, or the normal organs of an adult animal of a foreign species. Whether or not this extensive proliferation of the white blood cell elements is to be looked on as a stimulation of a center with metastasis in the membranes and organs, or whether it is a general stimulation to the anlage of the various cells, is a point difficult to determine. Judging from the distribution and character of the proliferation, the latter seems the more plausible view. Moreover, the reaction may be of the same type as that observed by Da Fano in mice after immunization against cancer by means of tissue injections. The changes he describes, however, were not so pronounced in character and were for the most part confined to the plasma cell in the connective tissues. The possibility of the action of infection must also be considered. Smears from the embryo spleen and the scattered nodules failed, however, to show microorganisms, and cultures taken on the ordinary media were negative for bacteria. If the reaction was a result of bacterial invasion, we should expect to find the changes occurring after the implantation of some of the transplantable rat and mouse tumors, for it is well known that they become highly contaminated. But such is not the case. A possible explanation of the necrosis is that the nutrition supply does not keep pace with the growth, so that a condition develops analogous to that of the central necrosis in rapidly growing tumors. We conclude, therefore, that grafts of adult spleen, bone marrow, liver, and kidney placed in the outer membrane of a chick embryo cause stimulation of the embryo spleen and lead to proliferation of certain leukocytic elements in the mesoderm, subcutaneous tissues, and around vessels in the liver and kidney.
1. Pneumococci, dysentery bacilli of the Shiga type, and Bacillus mucosus capsulatus are agglutinated immediately when injected into the circulation of actively immunized rabbits. 2. Staphylococcus aureus and albus, colon bacilli, meningococci, gonococci, and non-virulent pneumococci agglutinate in the circulation of normal rabbits. 3. Bouillon cultures of Bacillus avisepticus are highly toxic for both rabbits and dogs. The fresh sera of these animals have no bactericidal action upon the bacteria. Dog serum opsonized the bacilli in vitro, and they are agglutinated and opsonized in the circulation and organs of normal dogs. On the other hand, none of this occurs in connection with normal rabbits. A very small quantity of culture produces a fatal septicemia in rabbits, but a subtoxic dose is without effect in dogs. 4. The degree of agglutination and opsonization of bacteria within the animal body is inversely parallel to the infectiousness of the bacteria for the host.
Cultivation on 10 per cent rabbit blood agar did not affect the agglutinability of fifty-seven strains of typhoid bacilli. The authors were unable to confirm the observations of Gay and Claypole on the variation in agglutinability caused by cultivating the typhoid bacillus on blood agar. A typhoid bacillus showing irregularity in fermentation, agglutination, and indol production is described.
In summing up the practicability of the Petroff method which is in reality a refinement and improvement upon well known methods, it has possibilities both from the standpoint of diagnosis and the study of the tubercle bacillus. It is not a difficult technique, but requires considerable attention to detail. The results should be better in larger series of cases carried on in laboratories where more time is available for close observation of the cultures during the early periods of development. It is the early transplanting of minute colonies even in the presence of contaminations which results in pure cultures. As to the practical value of the method, my experience would lead me to conclude that where sputum is obtainable in suspected cases of tuberculosis in which the tubercle bacillus cannot be demonstrated, an opportunity for diagnosis would be missed if this technique were not applied. If the result is negative it means nothing; if positive an otherwise obscure case may be cleared up. The Petroff method offers an easy opportunity of isolating large numbers of pure cultures (Table I).
1. The growth of virulent pneumococci in homologous immune serum produces (a) variations in agglutinability, (b) decrease in virulence, (c) inhibition of capsule formation, (d) increase in phagocytability with normal serum, and (e) change in absorption power and antigenic properties. 2. Reversion to the original type in these changed forms takes place upon animal passage.
1. Normal guinea pigs treated by four to six instillations of horse serum into the nose on alternate days become either hypersensitive or refractory to an intravenous injection of 0.38 cc. of serum given 16 days after the last instillation. If the amount of serum in each instillation is as much as 0.2 cc., anaphylactic death is caused by the toxic injection. If the amount of serum in each instillation is reduced to 0.04 cc. the first intravenous injection is without marked effect, and a second injection and subsequent injections of the same amount of antigen are well tolerated in about half the cases. 2. The effect produced by a given dose of serum, whether protective or anaphylactic, depends probably upon the extent of contact with the mucous membrane of the nose. 3. Guinea pigs which, after nasal treatment, have become tolerant to a definite maximum intravenous injection of the antigen appear to increase the degree of their tolerance, at least up to a resting period of more than 4 months. The same does not hold in animals immunized by the peritoneal route. 4. The first two or three instillations of a series probably determine the biologic character, whether of hypersensitiveness or hyposensitiveness, of reaction towards the serum. 5. It is probable that, contrary to the case in parenteral sensitization, hypersensitiveness and protection, respectively, set up by nasal instillations and not followed by parenteral injections, gradually disappear in about 50 to 100 days. 6. We have failed in attempts to eliminate hypersensitiveness, due to subcutaneous injection of serum, by nasal instillations which would protect the normal animal from the development of anaphylaxis. 7. It is suggested that the principles of prophylaxis evolved under these relatively simple conditions should be applied in the study of infectious disease.
Intravenous inoculations of from 1 to 3 cc. per kilo of body weight of a bouillon culture of virulent pneumococci produce septicemia and meningitis in dogs. The injected pneumococci leave the circulation rapidly, but begin to reinvade the blood from 24 to 48 hours later. The septicemia reaches its climax between the 4th and 5th days and then abruptly declines, the blood becoming sterile within from 1 to 3 days after the height of the septicemia is reached. The initial disappearance of the pneumococci from the circulation has been found to be due to agglutination of the diplococci in the blood stream and accumulation of the clumps in the lungs, liver, spleen, etc. If the dogs are reinoculated during the ascension of the septicemia, the injected diplococci leave the circulation as rapidly as in normal dogs. Cultures isolated in this stage of the infection, both before and from 3 to 4 hours after the reinoculation, are resistant to the agglutinins and opsonins of immune sera that agglutinate and opsonize the cultures with which the dogs were originally infected. Thus it follows that the pneumococci are able to reinvade the circulation because they have acquired a fastness to the existing antibodies and not because the antibodies have been bound or exhausted. By reinoculating dogs at the time of the crisis in the septicemia it has been shown that the agglutination of the pneumococci is more rapid and complete and that the diplococci leave the circulation much more rapidly than in normal dogs. Hence acquired antibodies are operative within the animals at this time although they cannot be demonstrated in vitro until from 24 to 48 hours later. Pneumococci isolated as the infection is subsiding are more susceptible to the action of immune sera than the original cultures injected. It is probable that all the dogs would have survived the infection if a meningitis had not developed. In the acutely fatal cases of meningitis few pneumococci are phagocyted, while in the milder and convalescent cases much phagocytosis occurs. It is suggested that the incubation period of infectious diseases is due to the fact that the infecting agents must become adapted to the adverse conditions encountered in the newly infected host before they can multiply sufficiently to produce the symptoms of disease. It is further suggested that epidemics may arise because the infectious agent is passed from person to person in the ascending stage of the disease and thus enters new hosts in a state of maximum resistance to the natural antibodies of such individuals. When early contacts are avoided, epidemics tend to subside because the infectious agent is weakened by the action of acquired antibodies during the period of convalescence.
The main problem which has been considered in this paper is the identification of the small thymus cells. Cells resembling ?A infiltrate the cortical layer of the thymus. Whether these cells are true lymph cells, or whether they merely represent a disguised epithelial cell, could not be solved either by purely histological or by histo- and embryogenetic studies. Text-fig. 1 gives a scheme for the differentiation of the small thymus cells and the small lymphocytes, which led to a conception of the lymphoid nature of the small thymus cells. On the left of the figure is shown the origin and the normal differentiation of the small lymphocytes and their mother cells in birds. The source of the lymphoid cells is the loose mesenchyme. The small lymphocytes (S. Lmc.), normally situated in the spleen, in the connective tissue, and in the bone marrow, appear as differentiation products of the lymphoid hemocytoblasts (L. Hbl.), especially when the latter multiply intensely in a limited space, become smaller (S. L. Hbl.), and finally change their morphological structure. The small lymphocytes may themselves under definite conditions undergo further differentiation and develop into plasma cells (Plc.) and into granular lymphocytes (Gr. Lmc.), specific for birds. The mother cells of the small lymphocytes, the lymphoid hemocytoblasts, on the other hand, differentiate in granulopoietic organs (spleen, bone marrow) into granulocytoblasts (Grbl.) and granulocytes (Grc. (Lkc.) ). The histogenetic study of cell ?A shows that its nearest stem cells are represented by the cells ?B and ?C (page 93). The striking similarity in the structure of cell ?A with that of the small lymphocyte (on the left of the text-figure), as well as the analogy of the process of its differentiation, at the expense of cells ?B and ?C, with the normal origin of the small lymphocytes, has led many investigators to accept the mesenchymal origin of the small thymus cells. According to this view, cell ?A becomes a true small lymphocyte. In addition to this is the observation of an invasion of the epithelial thymus anlage by mesenchymal elements. According to the transformation theory cell ?A has become a disguised epithelial cell. The same was admitted for their stem cells ?B and ?C. As mentioned above, many characteristic morphological features of cell structure were shown to be not as essential as previously admitted. Nerve cells and epithelial and connective tissue cells may all assume a spherical shape in a liquid medium. How then are we to regard the small thymus cell ?A ? If the mother cell of the thymus cell ?A is really a lymphoid hemocytoblast, it must possess the differentiation potentialities of a true lymphoid hemocytoblast; it must have the faculty of differentiating not only into small lymphocytes but also into granulocytoblasts (Grbl.'') and further into granulocytes (Grc. (Lkc.)''). If the small thymus cell ?A is a small lymphocyte it must under definite conditions be able to differentiate in the directions characteristic of true small lymphocytes; namely, into plasma cells (Plc.'') and into granular lymphocytes (Gr. Lmc.''). The existence of these possibilities for differentiation of the small thymus cells ?A and their stem cells ?C have been experimentally proved by this study. It has been shown that the mother cell ?C may under certain conditions proliferate intensely and differentiate into granulocytoblasts and granular leukocytes. This is probably due to the stimulating action of certain metabolic products of the grafted spleen cells. It has been also shown that the small thymus cell ?A may differentiate physiologically into a granular lymphocyte, and under administration of x-ray into a plasma cell. All the changes observed on the small thymus cells and their mother cells apply under equal conditions to the lymphoid hemocytoblasts and to the true small lymphocytes in the regions of the organism where these cells are present.
JUDGING FROM THE MACROSCOPIC AND MICROSCOPIC STUDY OF THE ANIMALS TREATED WITH THE LIQUID, ITS ACTION UPON THE TUBERCULAR LESIONS SEEMS TO BE ABOUT AS FOLLOWS: The effect of a single injection upon the lesions is either negative or inconspicuous. But after repeated injections of the preparation the congestion and leukocytic infiltration about the lesions are markedly decreased, the cheesy material resulting from degeneration of the lesions and other degeneration products are in process of absorption, and young connective tissue is being actively produced in the periphery. While these changes are taking place the number of the bacilli is also being reduced until finally they can no longer be detected on microscopic examination. Hence it appears that while the preparation may lack bactericidal action in vivo powerful enough to destroy all the bacilli at one injection, yet repeated infusions may nevertheless bring about the destruction of all the bacilli and the modification of the tubercular lesion into that of the suspended stage or even into the healed condition. Whether, therefore, the preparation brings about these results directly by killing the bacilli or indirectly by favoring the healing processes of the body, nevertheless it has power to inhibit the growth of or annihilate entirely the bacilli in vivo. The experiments reported leave no doubt that Liquid D is capable of bringing about the healing of experimental tubercular lesions; but thus far that most important problem in chemotherapeutics, namely, the extent of the cure produced, has not been solved. The experiments indicate that sterility of the tissues as far as microscopic examinations go has been secured; but microscopic examination is not after all an absolute test of sterility. In order to test this point, emulsions were made of the lungs, liver, spleen, and other organs of Treated Animals 134 and 135 (Table VII), and they were inoculated into the abdominal cavity of guinea pigs. Some of the animals receiving the emulsion developed tuberculosis, and therefore absolute sterility of the treated animals had not been obtained in these instances. The problem of the destination and distribution of the preparation in the body of the treated animal, as well as its action against the tubercle bacilli, lesions, and the tubercular organs of the infected guinea pigs, is now being studied further with results to be reported at some future time.
A general review of the cases will, I think, indicate that the preparation greatly improves or apparently cures pulmonary and surgical tuberculosis in the first and second stages, and that it seems also to produce beneficial effects upon the disease in the third stage. The duration of these beneficial effects is still to be established by more numerous trials and many years of observation. The preparation must be given intravenously, and the doses must be increased or decreased according to the age and constitution of each patient (page 156). Moreover, it should be borne in mind that the pathological phenomena and the constitution of each patient have much to do with the determination of the dose. The manner of action of the preparation is not yet entirely clear. But if it acts primarily upon the tissues which bear the tubercular lesions and then indirectly against the germ, as I assume at present, the activity which the tissues exert will have much to do with the efficacy of the preparation. If this hypothesis is correct, the minimum doses (10 to 12 mg.) will be best suited to a patient who is greatly emaciated, and should be gradually increased as the reactions, pathological processes, nutrition, etc., indicate. In any case, the dose of the preparation must be determined by the condition and constitution of the patient. In animal experiments I have been fortunate enough to obtain results which no other preparation has given. The clinical application and the establishment of its full efficacy in human cases must be left to the physician.
Cyanocuprol is markedly effective in tuberculosis, and we believe that it will play an important part in clinical medicine. It may be used more generally than tuberculin. The amount of the dose is closely related to the reaction and the final results. It should be determined for each patient after a careful examination of his symptoms. The maximum dose of 8.5 cc. should in no case be exceeded. The shortest interval between injections should be 2 weeks. If the drug is given after a shorter interval, no improvement is observed and the effects are sometimes dangerous. In order to obtain the best results the patient should be placed under conditions of complete physical and mental rest after the injection; this applies even to light cases. Care should also be taken to secure rest for the lesion. During the period of the treatment irritants to the lesion, such as potassium iodide or tuberculin, should be avoided; apricot juice, guaiacol and its derivatives, and iodol are contraindicated. No marked idiosyncrasy has been noted and no accumulative effects have been observed.
This brief report deals with six cases of leprosy in which cyanocuprol has been administered with what appear to be beneficial effects. The treatment is being continued in still other cases.
While auricular fibrillation is easily recognized by arterial and jugular tracings or by electrocardiograms, it is not possible to interpret all the waves found in these records. The venous tracings may in general be placed in one of two classes: (a) those in which prominent systolic waves predominate or occur alone; and (b) those in which large or small diastolic waves occur occasionally, in groups, or in a continued series averaging 250 to 500 per minute. The prominent systolic waves have generally been attributed to tricuspid regurgitation, the inference being that tricuspid regurgitation is a common state in auricular fibrillation. The diastolic waves are so numerous and so many electrocardiograms show diastolic waves that it is impossible to account for them on the assumption that the auricle is in a dilated and finely fibrillating state. It has been suggested that in these instances a condition of coarse fibrillation, which is closely allied to auricular flutter, obtains. The systolic and diastolic waves of the venous pulse of twenty-five clinical cases of auricular fibrillation, recorded by photographic methods, were studied. Six types of systolic waves (Text-Fig. 1) were found: (1) an intensified impact wave, the most common and often the only characteristic feature, indicating vigorous ventricular action; (2) a peaked impact followed by a rapid systolic drop due to light pressure of the tambour; (3) the intra-auricular type of systolic variation, so called from its resemblance to intra-auricular pressure curves found in animals, occurring in clinical cases only when ventricular systole is weak; (4) double systolic waves, attributed to a systolic tug of the ventricle on the auricles and large veins; (5) a systolic impact followed by a stasis wave, present when intravenous pressure is high; (6) a regurgitation wave composed of a steep rise continued into a systolic plateau with murmur vibrations superimposed. Our study showed (1) that tricuspid regurgitation, as indicated by the presence of regurgitation waves, is a rare accompaniment of auricular fibrillation; and (2) that the contrary opinion, arrived at by the frequent presence in polygraph tracings of ventricular types of waves, is due to the fact that the contour of intensified impact waves is distorted by polygraph levers so that they simulate regurgitation waves. Recurrent diastolic waves were frequently present in our records. Their relative size depended, to a considerable extent, on the pressure of the tambour. There was no constant relation to similar waves in the recorded electrocardiogram, nor is it proven that they are indicative of a coarse type of fibrillation or an associated flutter.
There may be produced in rabbits by the intravenous injection of large doses of diphtheria toxin a vascular degeneration involving the entire aorta, the carotids to the base of the skull, the subclavians, and iliacs, and, for a varying distance distally, the brachials, femorals, and large abdominal vessels. The first part of the pulmonary artery is sometimes affected. The lesion is practically diffuse throughout the aorta and vessels mentioned, consisting of a fatty degeneration and necrosis of the smooth muscle in a wide zone of the media and a crowding together of the elastic fibers in the region affected, resulting in an irregular thinning of the vessel walls and many small aneurysmal pouchings. In rabbits which received pituitrin with the diphtheria toxin extensive calcification occurred throughout this degenerated zone, both in the aorta and other large vessels. It is believed, however, that pituitrin is not essential to the calcification and that if it is of any importance it is because an extreme fatty degeneration is produced more quickly in the media of the vessels when it is administered simultaneously with the toxin. Diphtheria toxin, given in large doses intravenously, produces in the kidneys of the rabbit a pronounced vascular and parenchymatous degeneration. The former consists of a swelling and desquamation of the endothelial cells of the arterioles and small veins with the formation of fibrinous thrombi, a necrosis and thrombosis of the capillaries of the tufts with hemorrhage and the formation of fibrinous and hyaline masses, and in some of the affected glomeruli considerable collections of polymorphonuclear leukocytes.
1. Accessory lobes of thymus, derived from the third pharyngeal pouch, occurring in close association with the parathyroids from the third pouch, were found in serial section of the cervical tissues of eleven out of fourteen guinea pigs, and probably would have been found in all fourteen but for a technical error. 2. It is probable, therefore, that accessory lobes of thymus having this situation and origin are usually, if not always, present in the guinea pig. 3. Additional accessory lobes of thymus belonging to, but at some distance from the main lobe were also present in several of the animals. 4. The discovery of these accessory lobes makes it certain that the guinea pig is unsuitable material for complete thymectomy, and probably complete extirpation of the thymus in this animal is rarely, if ever accomplished. 5. The extirpation experiments of previous investigators in the guinea pig must now be regarded as partial extirpations, and their results interpreted in that light. 6. Extirpation of the thymus in the guinea pig produced no changes in the writer's experiments. 7. The study of the serial sections of the cervical tissues of the guinea pig indicates that Ruben's statements regarding the parathyroid derived from the fourth pharyngeal pouch in the guinea pig are correct,-that it is much smaller than parathyroid III, may be rudimentary, and is sometimes absent at least on one side. 8. No accessory lobe of thymus was found accompanying the parathyroid from the fourth pouch, a finding also bearing out Ruben's statement that no thymus anlarge springs from the fourth pouch in the guinea pig.
1. The inconstant results of past observations on the relation of pituitary extracts to renal activity have been due chiefly to unsuitable methods. 2. A standard curve of artificially induced polyuria may be plotted for rabbits, giving 200 cc. of water by mouth. 3. Extracts of the pars intermedia and posterior lobe of the hypophysis, given by mouth, subcutaneously, or intravenously, are able definitely to check polyuria thus induced. Extracts of the anterior lobe show a similar effect, but only to a slight degree. 4. This antidiuretic effect is constant, and is independent of (a) changes in blood pressure, (b) intestinal absorption, and (c) the vagi. The effect is apparently prevented or delayed by division of the splanchnics, and is diminished by division of the renal nerves near the hilus. 5. A similar antidiuretic property is possessed: (a) by beta-imidazolylethylamine, (b) by p-oxyphenylethylamine, (c) by a preparation from Secale cornutum, (d) by small doses of nicotine, (e) by large doses of caffeine, and (f) by extracts of the adrenal cortex. 6. No effect on the polyuria is produced: (a) by strychnine (b) by morphine, (c) by adrenalin, or by extracts of (d) thyroid, (e) thymus, (f) pineal, (g) pancreas, or (h) corpora lutea. 7. In animals under chloral or paraldehyde anesthesia a short and inconstant initial increase in flow of urine is seen. 8. The antidiuretic effect is absent or only slightly marked in checking the so called salt diuresis.
By the tryptic digestion of cultures in vitro of avian and mammalian connective tissue, suspensions of individual, living cells have been obtained. Their ability to phagocyte carmine and bacteria has been tested. The great majority of them fail to take up either, but a few large cells are able to do so. They will ingest bacteria only when serum is present; that is, they require the interaction of opsonins. There is good reason to suppose that the phagocytic cells are endothelial in nature. Should they prove to be fibroblasts, like the other elements present, the fact will remain that the phagocytic power of fibroblasts is practically negligible. Their failure to ingest foreign matter in vivo is to be laid not to the obstacles offered by the solidity of the tissue they compose, but to an inherent lack of ability on their part. The phagocytosis of blood pigment, bacteria, etc., which takes place in granulation tissue in vivo is probably carried on wholly by endothelial cells and wandering cells.
With the clinical recognition, that different degrees of fibrillation occur and that these in turn are closely related to a coordinated type of auricular tachyrhythmia (flutter); further, that one type may lapse into another or into a perfectly normal rhythm, the conviction has grown that finer and coarser types of auricular movement may be recognized by the amplitude of the diastolic waves of the electrocardiogram and venous pulse. The present investigation into the cause of these waves has shown that this is not possible. There is no theoretical or experimental reason for the assumption that any fixed relation exists between the amplitude of the electrical variations of the electrocardiogram, which are the resultant of variations accompanying the irregularly spreading excitation wave, and the degree of mass contraction following. The large recurrent waves of the venous pulse, which may with more reason be regarded as related to the size of the auricular mechanical contractions on theoretical grounds, are also shown to be without differential value. The reasons for this may be briefly summarized. In the first place, the presence of diastolic waves is contingent upon a slow heart rate and long ventricular diastoles. With rapid heart rate their occurrence is prevented by the closely placed systolic variations. It is therefore conceivable that both coarse and fine fibrillation as well as flutter will be without diastolic waves as long as the heart is rapid. Even in the cases with long beats present their significance must remain doubtful. It is true that in the experiments the waves accompanying coarse fibrillation are as a rule somewhat larger than those occurring during fine fibrillation; waves of considerable size may, however, be present in fine fibrillation. Hence, as long as no calibrated method of recording is possible, it is difficult to draw any inference. It is possible from the same patient to record with the same apparatus diastolic waves of varying amplitude by merely changing the pressure of the receiving tambour. The chief reason that the amplitude of these waves cannot be regarded as of differential value is found in their origin. Fine fibrillating movements of the auricle do not in themselves produce waves in the jugular. They produce neither pressure variations in the auricle, nor exert any traction upon the veins. The only factor capable of producing jugular waves during fine fibrillation seems to be the traction exerted by the position changes of the ventricle on the auricle and large veins. This may, in a measure, explain why the diastolic waves recorded from the apex and second left interspace of patients often closely correspond with those simultaneously recorded from the jugular. The term "fibrillary waves" commonly applied to the smaller of these variations is evidently poorly chosen when their etiology is considered. The coarser contractions of the auricle during coarse fibrillation also produce no pressure changes within the auricle. They are vigorous enough at times, however, to exert a traction upon the venous walls. Hence, the waves during coarse fibrillation may be regarded as partly of ventricular and partly of auricular origin, or, as is frequently the case, as due to an interference of the two tractions. It is owing to their dual origin that they are more numerous and distinct when recorded from the same animal without changing the position or pressure of the receiving apparatus.
1. Since our first report on the discovery of the cause of rat-bite fever, we have been able to prove the existence of the same spirochete in five out of six more cases which have come under our observation. 2. The clinical symptoms of rat-bite fever are inflammation of the bitten parts, paroxysms of fever of the relapsing type, swelling of the lymph glands, and eruption of the skin, all occurring after an incubation period usually of from 10 to 22 days, or longer. 3. Our spirochete is present in the swollen local lesion of the skin and the enlarged lymph glands. But as the spirochetes are so few in number it is exceedingly difficult to discover them directly in material taken from patients. It is therefore better to inoculate the material into a mouse. In some cases the organism is found in the blood of the inoculated animal after a lapse of 5 to 14 days, or at the latest 4 weeks. 4. Generally speaking, the spirochetes present thick and short forms of about 2 to 5 micro and have flagella at both ends. Including the flagella, they measure 6 to 10 micro in length. Some forms in the cultures reach 12 to 19 micro excluding the flagella. The curves are regular, and the majority have one curve in 1 micro. Smaller ones are found in the blood and larger ones in the tissues. 5. The spirochetes stain easily. With Giemsa's stain they take a deep violet-red; they also stain with ordinary aniline dyes. The flagella, too, take Giemsa's stain. 6. The movements of our spirochetes are very rapid, resembling those of a vibrio, and distinguish them from all other kinds of spirochetes. When, however, the movements become a little sluggish, they begin to present movements characteristic of ordinary spirochetes. 7. For experimental purposes, mice, house rats, white rats, and monkeys are the most suitable animals. Monkeys have intermittent fever after infection, and spirochetes can be found in their blood, but they are not so numerous as in the blood of mice. Mice are the most suitable animals for these experiments, and they appear, as a rule, to escape fatal consequences. 8. The spirochete is markedly affected by salvarsan. 9. The organism is not present in the blood of all rats, and there is no relation between the species of the rat and the ratio of infection. We have never found the spirochete in healthy guinea pigs or mice. By permitting a rat infected with the spirochete to bite a guinea pig, the latter develops the disease. 10. We have succeeded in cultivating the spirochete in Shimamine's medium. 11. Among the spirochetes described in the literature or discovered in the blood of rats and mice, there may be some resembling our spirochete, but none of the descriptions agree with it fully. Hence we have named our organism Spirochaeta morsus muris and regard it as belonging to the Spironemacea (Gross) of the nature of treponema. 12. The spirochete can be detected in the bodies of patients. In seven cases out of eight, it disappears on recovery, only to reappear during the relapse. 13. The spirochete can be detected in about 3 per cent of house rats. These facts enable us to identify the cause of the disease. 14. There may be other causes than the spirochete for diseases following the bite of a rat. The cause, however, of rat-bite fever in the form most common in Japan is, we believe, the spirochete which we have described.
1. We have confirmed Ogata's results in experimental rat-bite fever caused by the bite of rats. 2. In our experiments with guinea pigs, swelling and congestion of the bitten parts, swelling of the subcutaneous lymph nodes, fever, and loss of weight were the typical symptoms. The progress of the fever was not so regular as in human cases, but we find records in the literature of patients who showed irregular fever types or were afebrile. The chief points that we noted in the anatomical view of the guinea pigs were swelling and congestion of the lymph gland system and acute changes in the adrenals and kidneys. 3. If an emulsion made from the lymph glands, cerebral substance, or the adrenals, or the heart's blood of a guinea pig of the original generation is inoculated subcutaneously or intraperitoneally into a fresh guinea pig, the animal invariably dies with the usual symptoms of fever and swelling of the lymph glands. The anatomical changes in this case were the same as those of the original guinea pig, except that the course was shorter and more regular. The same result was observed in further generations. No change was observed in pathogenicity, and in the guinea pigs of the original and further generations a species of spirochete as the causative agent was always observed. The incubation period in the original generation was from 1 to 2 weeks, and in further generations about 1 week. 4. When a mouse or white rat was inoculated, spirochetes always appeared in the peripheral blood, but no other symptoms developed. When peripheral blood drawn from a mouse thus treated was inoculated into a fresh mouse or a fresh white rat and peripheral blood drawn from the mouse and rat was inoculated into a fresh guinea pig, they all became infected and the guinea pigs always died. Thus we found that rats and mice are media but not victims of the disease, while guinea pigs are both media and victims of it. 5. In the rhesus monkey on which we made our experiment we witnessed a process similar to that of human rat-bite fever, and our spirochotes were observed in other animals into which blood drawn from the monkey was inoculated. 6. In the original animals spirochetes were seen chiefly toward the end of the process and the conditions as to the period previous to it are not yet clearly known. In further generations of all the animals we used, spirochetes were found in the peripheral blood 4 or 5 days after inoculation, and gradually multiplied until the greates number was reached about the 10th day after inoculation. They then began to decrease; yet spirochetes could be observed over 2 months later. 7. We have found spirochetes chiefly in the adrenals of the animals by Levaditi's method, but have not yet ascertained their distribution in other organs. 8. Our spirochete is short, round, and highly motile; it stains readily, and has few spirals. We have not yet observed an undulating membrane, but have seen what we believe to be flagellum at each end. 9. The identification of our spirochete with other species must be left for further study. The spirochete which Futaki, Takaki, Taniguchi, and Osumi found in two patients with rat-bite fever, seems to differ from ours in form. 10. Spirochetes disappear from the blood of the animals as a result of the injection of salvarsan, thus indicating that the spirochete is arsentropic.
We have shown in a series of 105 cases of pneumonia, 95 of which we have selected as available for statistical study, that digitalis given by mouth has an action on the heart. We have judged this action to be present because changes occurred in the auriculoventricular conduction time and in the form of the T wave of the electrocardiogram, just as they do in the non-febrile heart. This conclusion is strengthened by finding that the pulse rate in fibrillating and fluttering cases fell in the presence of fever, exactly as it does in non-febrile cases. The dose and the time required to produce these effects are given and are the same as in the non-febrile cases. When there was a difference in the amount necessary to produce one or the other of the changes, it was found that the T wave is more often and more readily affected than the conduction interval. We have shown that the intoxication due to pneumonia is probably not responsible for the changes found, both from a study of the statistics and because in the control cases reverse tendencies were often found (that is, decrease in conduction time and increase in the size of the T wave). We have shown that the method of selection in consequence of which we treated a large number of severe cases did not prejudice our results, because it could be demonstrated that the proximity of death, whether in control or treated cases, was not necessarily associated with the changes we are describing. We have also, by referring to the literature of the subject, brought evidence to show that heart muscle does not undergo those changes in pneumonia, as it does in other infectious diseases, which would lead one to expect changes in conduction found in other diseases. The changes in conduction which have been reported by others were almost entirely associated with the giving of digitalis.
We feel that the results obtained in the human case and in our animal experiments justify the supposition that magnesium sulphate may be of use in controlling cases of poisoning by strychnine. It is a method easily available not only in large hospitals but in private practice, and requires no elaborate technique. The amount of magnesium sulphate to be used should follow the advice of Meltzer (19) in tetanus cases: intraspinally 1 cc. of a 25 per cent solution to each 20 pounds of body weight in adults, and one-half the dose in young children. Should this not control the convulsions a small amount of ether may be used. In order to hasten the excretion of strychnine, 200 to 300 cc. of salt solution should be given intravenously.(6) In the event of the return of the convulsions, the intraspinal dose may be repeated, always taking precautions to keep the head elevated. Meltzer's apparatus for intrapharyngeal insufflation and a 2.5 per cent solution of calcium chloride should always be on hand in case of respiratory failure following an overdose of the magnesium salts (Meltzer (19)).
Summing up these results, we found that all the ten alpha-amino-acids used inhibited the growth of the cells and finally killed the cultures. This inhibition is preceded by a short period of activity. The typical effect on the cells is shown in Figs. 1 and 2. The first (Fig. 1) is a control culture showing the usual growth of cells and their typical spindle shape form. The second (Fig. 2) is a culture in plasma plus asparagine showing the cells rounded off and beginning to undergo dissolution. We do not wish to draw too extensive conclusions from these experiments, but we believe that toxicity of alpha-amino-acids towards growing cells has been shown beyond a reasonable doubt; while we have found that compounds of higher molecular weight, namely, the peptones of egg yolk and proteins, are non-toxic. This toxicity depends upon the concentration and the time that the cells are exposed to their action. As these factors are reduced, the toxicity is decreased. In this respect, these substances are similar to all cell poisons. Applying these results to the work done on the intravenous injection of digestion mixtures, we believe that we have found a reason for the death of the experimental animals when the hydrolyzed proteins were injected too rapidly. Buglia found that large amounts of alpha-amino-acids could be injected into the circulation without causing deep-seated changes in the renal and intestinal functions, provided they were injected slowly enough; in fact, that enough of these mixtures could be injected in this way to cover the nitrogen consumption of the body. This injection, however, was always accompanied by an alpha-amino excretion through the urine and an increase of the peristalsis, of the intestine, with resultant liquid stools. As is well known, a sudden great concentration of these substances in the blood of an animal causes death. These results agree with our findings Folin and Denis demonstrated the fact that alpha-amino-acids probably pass into the circulation through the intestines. Van Slyke and Meyer, by means of Van Slyke's nitrogen method, have practically proven this, and Abel, Rowntree, and Turner, and Abderhalden have lately succeeded in obtaining alpha-amino-acids in crystalline form from the blood. Van Slyke and Meyer have shown that the tissues take up alpha-amino-acids to a certain point, but that after this the limit of saturation is reached. This is not so in the liver, which continually desaturates itself by metabolizing the alpha-amino-acids that it has absorbed, and consequently maintains indefinitely its power of removing them from the circulation, as long as they enter it no faster than the liver can metabolize them. Marshall and Rowntree have shown that there is an increase of the alpha-amino-acid concentration in the blood after injuries to the liver, which have caused deep-seated anatomical changes. Our experiments prove that tissue cells in general are unable to live in the presence of any great concentration of these acids. At the present time we do not feel able to give an explanation of the significance of this evident toxicity. However, the fact in itself seems to indicate that we should expect stimulation from a certain increase of the alpha-amino-acid concentration in the body, or the concentration of any one of the acids, while a greater increase would lead to marked disturbances of the metabolism.
1. The resistance of erythrocytes of dogs to the hemolytic activity of cobra venom is increased after splenectomy. 2. This increased resistance was observed as early as 4 days after splenectomy and usually persisted for a period of about 3 weeks, when the resistance gradually decreased to normal or slightly beyond. 3. The decrease of resistance to the hemolytic activity of venom for the erythrocytes of splenectomized dogs following the primary increase is apparently coincident with the anemia following splenectomy. An intercurrent infection, such as distemper, tends to reduce the resistance of erythrocytes to venom. 4. An increased resistance of the erythrocytes to hypotonic salt solutions was found with all the splenectomized dogs in which these tests were made. Increased resistance to hypotonic salt solutions apparently persists for a longer period than the increased resistance to cobra venom. 5. As the lysis of erythrocytes by venom is dependent upon the presence of certain lipoidal substances within the cells, and as the spleen may exercise an influence over the lipoidal contents of corpuscles and serum, it is suggested that the increased resistance of erythrocytes to the hemolytic activity of venom after splenectomy is due to alterations in the lipoid content of the erythrocytes.
Horse serum, kept for 2 hours at 38 degrees C. in the presence of one-fifth its volume of a suspension of 0.5 per cent of pararabin inphysiological salt solution and then freed by means of centrifugalization and filtration from the pararabin produced when injected in appropriate doses into a normal rabbit, a considerable and prolonged fall of the blood pressure, a distinct retardation in the coagulation of the carotid blood, and sometimes, in addition, acceleration of the respiratory rate and the expulsion of numerous scybala; that is, the various symptoms observed to occur after the intravenous injection of horse serum in sero-anaphylactized rabbits. If the horse serum is first heated for 30 minutes to 56 degrees C. and then treated with pararabin in the manner described above, the intravenous injection of this serum into a normal rabbit exerts no more action on the arterial pressure, the coagulability of the arterial blood, the respiratory rate, and the intestinal activity, than does normal horse serum when introduced into the vein of a normal rabbit.
The intoxication which develops as the result of a simple obstruction or a closed intestinal loop is accompanied by definite changes in the coagulable proteins of the blood serum. These changes consist essentially in an alteration in the normal albumin-globulin ratio; the globulin fraction is greatly increased and at times the normal relation of the two fractions may show a complete inversion. The increase in the globulin content of the blood serum is most marked in the animals which show some of the complications met with in loop animals,-rupture of the loop and peritonitis. In the latter conditions especially, the globulin increase is rapid and large. We believe this reaction to be of diagnostic value in acute infections attended by the sudden liberation and absorption of a toxic exudate. Infections and intoxications produced by inflammatory irritants are also accompanied by a rise in the blood globulins. This observation suggests that tissue disintegration with absorption of toxic products is responsible for the changes noted, and that bacterial invasion is important only in as far as it gives rise to toxic substances. Animals which have developed a tolerance to proteose intoxication following the periodic injection of small doses of proteose do not show a globulin increase. These experiments do not support the view that the rise in globulins observed in these experimental conditions is an expression of a resistance or tolerance developed by the animal. From the experimental evidence it seems more probable that the alteration in the partition of the blood protein fractions is one of the results of the metabolic disturbance which has been shown to occur in these conditions.
Nomenclature. As mentioned above, the prosopon and the nymph of the tsutsugamushi have many characteristics which distinguish it from the other trombidia. These are the pale color and small size of the body, delicacy of the skin, the conspicuous constriction between the cephalothoracic region and the abdomen, rudimentary eyes and tracheal openings, absence of tracheal capillaries, etc. The fact that the thumb or the appendage of the palpus does not start from the side of the fourth joint of the latter but from its end, is another charac teristic which does not occur in other trombidia. From the biological point of view two facts should be mentioned; i.e., the adult female does not deposit eggs in heaps, and in contrast to those of other species, the larvaae hatch out all through the year and feed on mammals. From these characteristics running through all the stages of development, we believe that we are justified in claiming a new genus for the tsutsugamushi. We therefore propose to change the scientific name given to this mite by Brumpt in 1910, Trombidium akamushi, and to introduce instead, according to the suggestion of Drs. Goto and Watase, the name Leptotrombidium akamushi. Determinaton of Leptotrombidium akamushi, N. Sp. Prosopon and Nymph. 1. Pale color. 2. Delicacy of the skin. 3. Distinct constriction between the cephalothoracic region and the abdomen. 4. Rudimentary, sessile eyes. 5. Indistinctnes of tracheal openings. 6. Absence of tracheal capillaries. 7. Crista abruptly widened at the end. 8. One palpal claw. Larva. 1. One scutum. 2. Round pinacles. 3. Legs, six joints, not counting the coxa. 4. Haris on the coza: one each on Joints 1, 2, and 3. 5. Hairs on the scutum, including two tactile hairs, seven; one is in the median line. Specific Determination of Leptotrombidium akamushi, N. Sp. (Trombidium akamushi Brumpt, 1910). Prosopon. 1. Small size 2. Three pairs of sucking discs on the external genitalia. 3. Hairs of the body feathered, club-shaped at the end, and the colorless. 4. The appendage of the palpus tapes distinctly towards the end. Nymph. 1. The size of the body is smaller thant that of the prosopon. 2. Two pairs of sucking discs on the external genitalia. There are no other distinct differences in the external morphology between the proposon and the nymph. Larva. 1. The color of the body is orange-red, but becomes paler after sucking on mammals. 2. The hairs of the body average 110 to 120 in number. 3. One pair of double eyes. 4. The sucking tube is visible when feeding on mammals (Hayashi). 5. The salivary gland is relatively large (Kawamura and Komagata). 6. The number and arrangemetn of the hairs on the legs and mouth parts correspond to the description given by Hirst. 7. The larvae are found all through the year. 8. The larva is the carrier of tsutsugamushi disease in man.
1. A toxic constituent is present in the fresh pancreas of dogs before trypsinogen can have been activated. 2. The toxic fraction is present in the beta-nucleoprotein, and therefore is thermostable. 3. It is gradually destroyed by autolysis but can be obtained in concentrated form from a gland which has autolyzed 24 hours. 4. The toxic material is probably protein in nature. 5. Intravenous or intraperitoneal injection of from 0.05 to O.I gm. per kilo of body weight is usually fatal and elicits in dogs symptoms comparable to those of spontaneous hemorrhagic necrosis of the pancreas. 6. Dog pancreas differs from that of beef or pig in that guanylic acid and toxic protein combined with it are slowly broken down by autolysis. 7. After autolysis of dog pancreas the toxic protein and guanylic acid may be separated and obtained in relatively pure form.
1. A definite cycle exists in the mammary gland of the non-pregnant guinea pig which corresponds to the cycle in the ovary and uterus. This cycle can be presented through a curve in which the ordinates represent the degree of activity of the gland in a series of animals, and the abscissae the time since ovulation (period of sexual cycle). The curve passes through a first maximum at the time of heat and ovulation and gradually falls. The minimum is reached on the 6th day and continues until the 15th day after ovulation. Next begins the period when a new ovulation is imminent and the number of the proliferating glands again increases. We see. then that during the normal cycle the presence of well preserved, functioning corpora lutea does not lead to proliferation, neither do mature follicles have such an effect. On the other hand, the absence or degeneration of the corpora lutea is required to insure the proliferation of the mammary gland in the first period of the sexual cycle. If the sexual period is experimentally prolonged, we find in some instances proliferation, while in others it is absent. As far as we can determine at the present time, two factors seem to favor proliferation of the mammary gland under these conditions: (1) the presence of well preserved corpora lutea, particularly if they are associated with well preserved experimentally produced deciduornata, and (2) the imminence of a new period of heat. The connection between good corpora lutea and good deciduornata and the presence of proliferating mammary glands at this stage of the sexual cycle is, however, not absolute. There are cases in which a proliferating gland is associated with some degeneration of the corpus luteum. Or on the other hand a well preserved corpus luteum is associated with a non-proliferating gland. In some of the latter cases the simultaneous presence of a necrotic deciduorna may perhaps explain the lack of proliferation in the mammary gland. However, in the majority of cases we found the presence of good corpora lutea and good deciduomata associated with a proliferating mammary gland. Whether a living corpus luteum as such is able to produce proliferation of the gland is as yet doubtful. 2. Extirpation of the ovaries prevents not only the proliferation of the mammary gland associated with the first stage of the sexual cycle, the condition of heat and ovulation no longer taking place in castrated animals, but in all probability also inhibits the proliferation of the mammary gland which occurs under certain conditions towards the end of the sexual cycle, or in instances of experimentally prolonged sexual cycle in which well preserved corpora lutea and deciduornata are present. 3. In animals in which the ovaries were hypotypical, the mammary glands were in an inactive condition. The presence of hypotypical ovaries has the same influence on the mammary gland as castration. In the majority, but not in all of these cases well preserved corpora lutea were absent. 4. Complete extirpation of the corpora lutea seems directly or indirectly to prevent the secondary proliferation of the mammary gland, which occurs during the latter part of the sexual cycle or during an experimentally prolonged cycle, in cases in which the extirpation is not followed at once by a new ovulation. This conclusion we consider, however, merely as suggested, not yet as definitely established through our results. On the other hand, the primary proliferation of the mammary gland, during the first stage of the sexual cycle, as well as ovulation and the objective signs of heat, is accelerated through complete extirpation of the corpora lutea. Thus the effect of extirpation of the corpora lutea differs from the effect of castration, in that after the latter neither a new heat nor the primary proliferation of the mammary gland occurs. As one of the authors has pointed out previously, the absence of functioning corpora lutea and the presence of either well developed ovarian follicles or of mature follicles are necessary for the occurrence of heat and ovulation. The same conditions are prerequisites for the primary proliferation of the mammary gland. 5. In cases in which the whole or almost the whole uterus had been extirpated, the corpora lutea were well preserved and the mammary gland was proliferating.
1. In the pregnant guinea pig proliferation of the mammary gland becomes regular only at a later stage of pregnancy; namely, during the period following the 24th day of pregnancy. Previous to this period proliferation was absent in the majority of cases. Proliferation of the mammary gland during pregnancy becomes regular only at a period of time which exceeds the duration of the normal sexual cycle unaccompanied by pregnancy. It is probable that pregnancy as well as the presence of living deciduornata and corpora lutea increases the proliferative activity of the mammary gland as compared with the ordinary cycle in non-pregnant animals or in animals lacking corpora lutea and deciduornata. 2. After the completion of pregnancy and in the beginning of secretion some mitotic proliferation may still be present, but it soon ceases, probably as the result of those processes that lead to secretion. While during the period of secretion, notwithstanding the presence of a new pregnancy, mitotic proliferation soon ceases, some proliferative stimulus seems still to be active, which, however, under existing conditions apparently leads only to a mitotic multiplication of nuclei. The latter conclusion is only suggested at the present time and needs confirmation through further studies. 3. In cases in which abortion took place in the first half of pregnancy secretion in the gland was not established; secretion occurred in two animals aborting toward the latter part of pregnancy. In one of these cases, mitotic proliferation of some gland cells was associated with the microscopic appearances of secretion. 4. In guinea pigs castrated during an early period of pregnancy in which pregnancy continued for some time, proliferative changes were absent in the mammary gland. In conjunction with a partial similar effect observed after extirpation of the corpora lutea during pregnancy, we may perhaps attribute the lack of proliferation in some of these cases to the absence of the ovaries. 5. Extirpation of the corpora lutea during pregnancy induces a new ovulation and with it the primary proliferation in the mammary gland; abortion does not necessarily prevent these proliferative changes. Extirpation of the corpora lutea during pregnancy perhaps prevents the secondary proliferative changes in the mammary gland. 6. Five injections of cow's lutein given in relatively large quantities intraperitoneally do not produce proliferation of the mammary gland in the guinea pig.
The present investigation brought out the facts that the pupil of the cat is little affected by instillation of adrenalin, but shows, nevertheless, a greater responsiveness to adrenalin when given intravenously than does that of the rabbit, and that the duration of the dilatation effected by intravenous injection is, on the contrary, longer in the rabbit. In regard to the vasoconstricting effect of adrenalin when administered intravenously, it was found that the intensity as well as the duration of the rise of blood pressure was greater in the rabbit than in the cat.
1. Microscopical examination of sputum that has been washed with isotonic salt solution indicates its source. Sputum from above the vocal cords contains polygonal flat epithelial cells and numerous species of non-pathogenic microorganisms. Sputum from below the cords is clear of saprophytes, although it sometimes contains bronchoalveolar cuboidal cells. 2. The source of the sputum can be determined by the erythrocytes and the bacilli that are contained in it, and the site of the lesion can also be ascertained. 3. In every instance I found erythrocytes in the pulmonary sputum after severe pulmonary hemorrhage. 4. Six of the cases of laryngeal affection referred to in the presentpaper had had no subjective symptoms, but microscopical examination showed tubercle bacilli in the laryngeal sputum. All the six cases were examined by Dr. Tanaka and were found to have tuberculous lesions in the larynx. In the laryngeal sputum of most cases of laryngeal tuberculosis with symptoms, tubercle bacilli have been frequently demonstrated, while in some cases contaminated laryngeal sputum was obtained only after a long series of examinations. 5. Microscopical examination of the sputum plays a significant part in the diagnosis of tuberculosis.
Trichomonades from the mouth were studied by Steinberg who proposed to group them into three distinct types; namely, Trichomonas elongata, Trichomonas caudata, and Trichomonas flagellata. Doflein (3) regards them as probably identical with Trichomonas hominis. Opinions differ as to whether or not Trichomonas vaginalis Donn and Trichomonas hominis Grassi are the same species. Lynch, for instance, believes that they are the same species, while von Prowazek (4), Bensen (5), and others (6, 7) insist that they are different types. Bensen's view seems to be well supported by the difference alleged to be found between the mode of encystment in the two trichomonades, were it not for the fact that our knowledge about the so called cyst of trichomonades is still obscure. According to Alexeieff (8) many of the so called cysts were evidently blastomyces contained in the cell body of the trichomonas. An autogamy alleged to take place in cysts as described by Bohne and von Prowazek (9) has not been confirmed by Dobell (10). And Wenyon (11) contends that it has never been found possible to produce any development of these cysts outside the body on the warm stage as can be done with the cysts of Entamoeba coli. Therefore, it is still premature to take the process of encystment into consideration as far as the classification of trichomonas is concerned. On the other hand, Rodenwaldt (12) seems to think that there are many species of trichomonas in the human intestines, and Wenyon has described a new trichomonas from the human intestines (Macrostoma mesnili Wenyon). Further cultural studies in the morphology and biology of these organisms must be carried out in order to solve these problems. In the light of modern investigations there are five subgenera to be included under the genus Trichomonas Donn. They are as follows: (1) Protrichomonas Alexeieff, with three anterior flagella, without an undulating membrane. (2) Trichomastix Biitschli) with three anterior flagella and a trailing flagellum (Schleppgeissel) without an undulating membrane. (3) Trichomonas Donn, with three anterior flagella and an undulating membrane. (4) Macrostoma Alexeieff, Amend, Wenyon (11), with three anterior flagella and an undulating membrane wedged in a deep groove (peristome). (5) Tetratrichomonas Parisi (13), with four anterior flagella and an undulating membrane. As far as our culture trichomonas from the human mouth is concerned, it has been shown that it is not strictly a trichomonas and that it should be classed under the subgenus Tetratrichomonas.
1. The toxic effect of uranium when given in a constant quantity per kilo of body weight is variable. This variation has been constantly associated with differences in the age of the animals. Uranium is more toxic for an old animal than for a young animal. The establishment of this fact, namely, that the age of an animal may modify the toxicity of a substance, should be taken into account in establishing by animal experiment the degree of activity of substances which are to be used for therapeutic purposes. 2. The toxic effect of uranium nitrate is constantly associated with its ability to induce a tissue acidosis. A severer grade of acidosis is induced in an old animal from uranium than is induced in a young animal. It would appear that in the response of dogs of different ages to uranium the animals represent a reaction system to this substance which shows an increasing susceptibility as the animal advances from youth to senility. Insufficient experimental data are as yet available to allow a discussion of the mechanism by which such an acid intoxication is produced. 3. The toxic effect of uranium is manifested locally by certain degenerative changes in the kidney. These changes are more marked in the kidney of an old animal than they are in the kidney of a young animal. Associated with the severer kidney changes which are especially characterized by a beginning swelling of the renal epithelium and by an accumulation of stainable fat in these cells is the development of a severe grade of tissue acidosis. 4. The functional capacity of the kidney shows a parallel with the degree of acid intoxication and with the severity of the histological changes which have developed in the renal epithelium.
Five cultures of Bacillus welchii have been studied and compared Four came from infected wounds in the western theatre of war, and one was obtained from a personal article of clothing. Each culture possesses the essential characteristics ascribed to that group of bacteria. The infectious processes caused by the five cultures in rabbits, guinea pigs, and pigeons, are local in character; and very few or no bacilli enter or are found in the general blood stream during life or immediately after death. Glucose broth cultures, injected intravenously, are fatal to rabbits. Death occurs, almost immediately or after a few hours. Agglutinative bacterial emboli have been ruled out as the cause of death, as has been an acid intoxication. The fluid part of the culture acts in the same manner as the full culture and irrespective of neutralization with sodium hydroxide. The full cultures and supernatant fluid are hemolytic when injected directly into the circulation of rabbits and pigeons, and the acute death produced may be ascribed to a massive destruction of red corpuscles. The passage of the fluid portion of glucose broth cultures through Berkefeld filters reduces materially the hemolytic and poisonous effects. Cultures of the Welch bacilli in plain broth to which sterile pigeon or rabbit muscle is added are highly toxic, and the toxicity is not noticeably diminished by Berkefeld filtration. The filtrates are hemolytic when injected intravenously and inflaming and necrotizing when injected subcutaneously and intramuscularly. The local lesions produced in the breast muscles of the pigeon closely resemble those caused by infection with the bacilli. The toxicity of these filtrates is not affected by neutralization with sodium hydroxide, but is materially reduced by heating to 62 degrees C. and entirely removed by heating to 70 degrees C. for 30 minutes. Successive injections of carefully graded doses of this toxic filtrate in pigeons and rabbits give rise to active immunity. The blood taken from the immunized rabbits is capable of neutralizing the toxic filtrate in vivo and in vitro. The filtrate has therefore been designated as toxin and the immune serum as antitoxin. The antitoxin neutralizes the toxin in multiple proportions. Hence the latter would seem to possess the properties of an exotoxin. Moreover, it neutralizes the hemolytic as well as the locally .injurious toxic constituent. Antitoxic serum prepared from a given culture of Bacillus welchii is neutralizing for the toxins yielded by the other four cultures of that microorganism. The antitoxin is protective and curative against infection with the spore and the vegetative stages of Bacillus welchii in pigeons. The limits of the protective and curative action are now under investigation.
The outline which has been given of the relative toxicity of Grhant's anesthetic in normal animals, in animals that were nephropathic from uranium and protected against the anesthetic by an alkaline solution, and in those animals which were unprotected by such a solution, furnishes the basis for the following summary. The kidney of the normal dog is relatively non-susceptible to the toxic action of Grhant's anesthetic. The kidneys have failed to show any change in their histological structure during the period of anesthesia. These animals have remained diuretic during the period of anesthesia and have responded to diuretics such as theobromine, pituitrin, and solutions of urea and sodium chloride. Normal animals anesthetized with Grhant's mixture for 1(1/2) hours usually show at the end of the experiment either no change, or only a slight variation from the normal, in the hydrogen ion content of the blood, the alkali reserve of the blood, and in the tension of carbon dioxide. In several normal dogs which were over 4 years of age, by the end of an anesthesia of such a duration the animals have shown a reduction in the alkali reserve of the blood and also a decrease from the normal in the carbon dioxide tension of alveolar air. From this observation it would appear that even in a normal animal Grhant's anesthetic tends to induce an acid intoxication, and as was the case with normal animals which were being intoxicated by uranium, such an intoxication is more readily induced in an old animal than in a young one. The nephropathic animals which have been anesthetized by Grhant's anesthetic and in which an attempt has been made to protect these animals against the toxic effect of the anesthetic by the use of asolution of sodium carbonate fall into two clear-cut groups. Those animals of the series not over 1(1/2) years old have shown at the end of the uranium intoxication and prior to the use of the anesthetic a less severe acid intoxication than have the animals of the series which were over 1(1/2) years old. In this younger group of animals the intravenous injection of a 3 per cent solution of sodium carbonate immediately before the animals were anesthetized has succeeded in protecting these animals against the toxic action of the anesthetic. During the following 1(1/2) hours of anesthetization these animals have not developed a severe grade of acid intoxication, and in several of the animals at the end of the experiment the alkali reserve of the blood was in excess of what it was at the end of the uranium intoxication and before an anesthetic was administered. Animals of this protected group have remained diuretic throughout the experiment and have shown an active diuresis from pituitrin, theobromine, and solutions of urea and sodium chloride. The kidneys of such animals have shown histologically a normal vascular tissue, a convoluted tubule epithelium which gave the appearance of being hyperactive, and only occasionally were tubules encountered which showed signs of an early epithelial degeneration. The nephropathic animals of the series in which a solution of sodium carbonate failed to afford any protection against Grhant's anesthetic were animals over 1(1/2) years old in which the uranium intoxication had resulted in a severer grade of add intoxication than in the younger animals. When these older animals were given intravenously the carbonate solution and were anesthetized, it was found impossible to increase the alkali reserve of the blood to the same extent as was possible in the younger animals. Furthermore, the alkaline solution during the period of anesthesia is rapidly used up so that by the termination of these experiments the animals may have an alkali reserve of the blood which may be even lower than was the alkali reserve before the use of the carbonate. These animals have remained completely anuric throughout the experiments and have shown no diuretic effect from those diuretics which in the animals that were successfully protected by the carbonate induced free diuresis. The kidneys of these anuric animals show no degenerative changes in the glomerular vessels. The capillaries are not distended with blood as has been the case with the diuretic group. The epithelium of the convoluted tubules is acutely swollen. The swelling has frequently taken place to such an extent that the lumen of the tubules has become obliterated. The nephropathic animals of the series which served as control animals and which were given a solution of sodium chloride equimolecular with the carbonate solution, following Grhant's anesthetic became completely anuric. The sodium chloride solution furnished no protection against the anesthetic. The animals of all ages became anuric and unresponsive to the diuretic substances which have been used during this study. With the establishment of a state of anuria in these control animals the hydrogen ion content of the blood has increased, the alkali reserve of the blood has been rapidly depleted, and associated with this change the carbon dioxide tension has been reduced. The rapidity with which these changes develop and the degree of acid intoxication which is induced is more marked in these animals than in any of the other series. The kidneys of the control animals show the severest grade of degeneration of any of the nephropathic animals. The epithelium of the convoluted tubules is not only severely swollen but the cells frequently show necrosis. The loops of Henle contain more stainable fat than has been demonstrated in the kidneys of the carbonate animals.
A valve is described for the control of ether vapor for anesthesia which regulates the mixture of ether vapor from a Woulfe bottle with air in any proportion, without changing the volume or the pressure at which the mixture is delivered. The regulation of the air stream both to and from the ether bottle controls the mixture accurately and is an essential feature of the valve. Except for experimental purposes, it is not considered profitable to determine on an arbitrary scale the tension of the ether vapor obtained, because the depth of the anesthesia should always be judged by the condition of the subject. The valve was devised for the Meltzer-Auer method of intratracheal insufflation, but it is adapted for use wherever a constant mixture of air and ether vapor is desired. Several respiration machines for supplying and interrupting the air stream, using this constant volume valve for the regulation of the ether supply, have been in use in Dr. Meltzer's laboratory for periods up to 2 years, and the simplicity and efficiency of the valve have been thoroughly tested. A description of the complete machine will be published later.
1. Culex pipiens raised from the larval stage in water experimentally contaminated with an abundance of poliomyelitic virus were found to be incapable of causing the infection when allowed in large numbers to bite normal Macacus monkeys. 2. Culex pipiens which were fed on infected poloimyelitic monkeys during different stages of the disease were found to be incapable of transmitting the infection when allowed in large numbers to bite normal Macacus monkeys. A previous disturbance of the meninges by an injection of horse serum into the intrathecal space did not alter the result, which was negative. 3. The offspring of the mosquitoes which were either reared in the infected tanks or fed on infected monkeys were found to be entirely harmless when allowed to feed in large numbers on a normal monkey. There was no hereditary transmission of the virus from one generation to another. 4. No trace of the virus of poliomyelitis was demonstrable in the filtrate of an emulsion of adult flies and pupae of the common housefly and bluebottle fly which were reared in the laboratory on slices, emulsion, or filtrate of monkey brain containing the poliomyelitic virus. The intracerebral injection of the filtrate produced no poliomyelitic infection in the normal monkey.
1. Anaerobic methods have been devised which depend upon the catalytic action of platinized asbestos upon hydrogen and oxygen. 2. The methods may be utilized for the growth of anaerobes in test-tubes, upon Blake bottles, in flasks, and in a large container. 3. Because oxygen is so completely removed, the methods are of great value in the successful cultivation of absolute anaerobes.
The determination of pneumococcus types in lobar pneumonia is of value in the field of prognosis and as a prerequisite for specific serum therapy. The method for the determination of types should be as rapid as possible and a standard technique should be employed. The most satisfactory method is by the intraperitoneal inoculation of a mouse with the patient's sputum, by which means a rapid and abundant growth of the pneumococcus is obtained and secondary organisms are rapidly eliminated in most instances. The diagnosis of type is made directly on the peritoneal exudate. Certain factors in the method commonly used have interfered with the rapid determination of types in an appreciable number of cases, notably the growth of other organisms in the peritoneal exudate together with the pneumococcus, and some confusion has arisen because occasional strains of pneumococci have been encountered that show cross agglutination reactions when undiluted immune serum is used. Such reactions have been shown to be due to a limited zone of non-specific immunity and they in no way invalidate the classification of the pneumococci into sharply defined immunological groups. The optimum dilutions of serum have been determined that will agglutinate all type strains of pneumococci and fail to cause any cross agglutination reactions when mixed with equal amounts of pneumococcus cultures and incubated for I hour at 37 degrees C. They are a 1:20 dilution of Serum I, a 1:20 dilution of Seruifa II, and a 1:5 dilution of Serum III. For the diagnosis of Subgroup II pneumococci undiluted Type II serum is required. To obviate the other difficulties of the method commonly used a new method for the determination of types has been devised. It depends upon the fact that there is produced by the growth of the pneumococcus a soluble substance which is present in the peritoneal exudate of the mouse in sufficient quantity to give a specific precipitin reaction with the homologous immune serum. The precipitin method can be used in all instances in which the determination of types by the agglutination method is possible, and it possesses certain distinct advantages which make it available when the agglutination method is impracticable. It is of particular value as a time-saving device in those instances where the presence of other organisms together with the pneumococcus in the peritoneal exudate causes a delay of 18 hours or more before the type of pneumococcus can be definitely established. It is therefore recommended as the method of choice in all cases. If desired, both the agglutination and precipitin methods may be applied to the same specimen of peritoneal washings.
Of twenty infected cases treated with Dakin's solution or chloramine paste, seven were bacteriologically sterile. This proves that, in general, 35 per cent of the cases thus treated become bacteriologically aseptic. This degree of asepsis is not necessary in order to suture the wound, the absence of bacteria in films being sufficient. Complete sterilization of wounds, can, therefore, now be accomplished.
Dakin's toluene sodium p-sulfochloramide, mixed with sodium stearate, forms a paste sufficiently active and stable to be used in the treatment of wounds.
Sodium stearate has no effect upon the bacteriological condition of a wound, but the addition of 4 parts per 1,000 of chloramine-T renders it antiseptic. Experiment I enabled us to compare the action of sodium stearate alone with that of sodium stearate containing 4 parts per 1,000 of chloramine-T. Wounds which had been previously sterilized could be maintained in an aseptic condition by 4 parts per 1,000 of chloramine-T, although in some cases reinfection occurred (Experiments 2, 3, and 5). For this reason the concentration of chloramine-T was increased. Surface wounds, deep-seated wounds, and osseous cavities, which had previously been either completely or almost completely sterilized, could be maintained for days and even weeks in a condition of surgical asepsis by the use of a paste containing 7 and 10 parts per 1,000 of chloramine-T. Experiments 7, 8, 9, 10, and 12 are examples of this. Slightly infected wounds (Experiments 9, II, and 12) were sterilized in the same manner. Next, it was attempted to sterilize wounds which were suppurating and more or less infected, and in some cases accompanied by fracture. This attempt was probably successful because the wounds used for the experiments showed but slight quantities of secretions and only a shallow layer of necrotic tissue. It is useless to attempt to sterilize severely infected wounds with a paste, for the volume of chloramine-T that can be applied is too limited. A large volume of an active substance is required to sterilize a wound which secretes great quantities of pus, for owing, on the one hand, to the dilution of this substance with the secretions, and, on the other, to its combination with the proteins contained in the pus, the concentration of the antiseptic is rapidly diminished. For these reasons it is essential that the antiseptic solution should be constantly renewed, so that the concentration may be sufficiently strong to effect the destruction of the bacteria. Therefore, the chloramine-T paste cannot sterilize a severely infected wound. The concentration of the active substance contained in a paste must at the same time be sufficiently weak to be innocuous to the tissues. We have seen that it should not exceed 15 parts per 1,000. Thus, it is evident that if the secretions from the wounds are abundant, the substance could exert its action upon the microorganisms for the space of only a few hours. For this reason the chloramine paste should only be applied under the conditions specified in our experiments; that is, in connection with moderately infected wounds which have been carefully washed with sodium oleate, and possess but slight quantities of secretion. Under these conditions, the chloramine paste effects the complete disappearance of the bacteria and maintains the sterility thus secured for as long a time as may be wished. If the technique followed in the dressing is not exactly as above described, reinfection will occur. If applied in this manner the chloramine paste is not injurious to the tissues, for the cicatrization curves of the wounds thus treated show but slight modification from the calculated curves. Chloramine paste makes it possible, therefore, to keep wounds sufficiently free from microorganisms so that the effect of substances which are believed to influence cicatrization can be studied.
1. Diphtheria toxin of known strength, injected intravenously into rabbits in single doses, produces lesions which are first evident in the endothelium of the tufts, and possibly in the intertubular capillaries. 2. The lesions of greatest severity with medium doses are also found in the tufts. 3. Evidence is presented to show that epithelial damage in the tufts and especially in the tubules is secondary to the vascular injury. 4. The severity of the lesions was roughly proportional to the amount of toxin injected. Hemorrhages did not occur with doses of less than 0.0023 cc. of toxin per kilo of body weight and were not extensive with doses of less than 0.004 cc. per kilo. 5. It is suggested that the localization of lesions in the tufts is due to the concentration of toxin in the blood that follows the loss of water at this point. 6. It is further suggested that this inference may be extended to explain the pathogenesis of the so called intracapillary form of glomerulonephritis.
1. Rabbits in which a mild grade of glomerular damage has been produced by small doses of diphtheria toxin develop a severe glomerulonephritis corresponding to the extracapillary form described by Volhard and Fahr after inoculations with sublethal quantities of Bacillus coli. 2. Similar, though not completely identical lesions are produced when diphtheria toxin is followed by intravenous injections of Vaughan's split protein (poisonous part) of Bacillus coli. 3. The inference is drawn that under the experimental conditions described Bacillus coli undergoes bacteriolysis and produces glomerular lesions through the toxic groups contained within its protein molecule.
The work of previous investigators gives the impression that it is easy to produce sera which both in vitro and upon injection are leukotoxic. At the same time the specificity of these leukotoxic sera for the particular type of cell used as antigen, and even for leukocytes in general, has been doubtful. The methods used have made certain possible factors of error unavoidable. Even careful washing of an organ or suspension cannot render it wholly blood-free, so that it is not surprising that the sera should be moderately hemolytic and hemagglutinative. Pearce has shown that the injection of very small amounts of blood is sufficient to evoke the production of immune hemolysins. When such sera are injected the lesions, as Pearce states, may be due in part to the production of hemagglutinative thrombi, although this hardly seems to apply to the changes in lymphoid tissue described by Flexner. On the other hand, the lymphotoxic effect of hemolytic sera may be due to the lymphocytes injected with the red cells. Our own experiments indicate that the lymphotoxic and agglutinative factors are to a considerable degree distinct from the hemolytic and hemagglutinative ones, since they can be separated from one another by absorption. Further evidence is presented that the small thymus cells are biologically related to, if not identical with the lymphocytes derived from lymph glands.
1. Urea retention, in the sense of a relatively increased concentration in the blood, is the result of increased resistance to the excretion of urea through the kidneys. 2. The relatively increased concentration of urea in the blood overcomes the increased resistance to excretion, and the organism is thereby maintained in nitrogenous equilibrium. 3. The laws formulated by Ambard for the excretion of urea apply in the condition of urea retention under a widely varying range of conditions, as to nitrogen intake and excretion. 4. The numerical value of Ambard's constant changes in urea retention, but the relation of the variable factors to one another remains otherwise unchanged. 5. In certain individuals, with otherwise normal findings in regard to urea excretion, an unusual degree of constancy, to which we have applied the term fixation, has been found in the numerical results obtained by the application of Ambard's laws. These individuals are regarded, as the result of this study, as probably abnormal, but the pathological significance of the fixation has not been determined.
The intratracheal injection of one moderate dose of adrenalin in rabbits whose vagi are divided produces a marked pulmonary edema in a large percentage of cases. The same dose in normal animals causes only slight effects. Artificial respiration greatly reduces the production of pulmonary edema in vagotomized rabbits after adrenalin. As adrenalin can exert a bronchoconstrictor effect, evidence is submitted to show that the aspirating action of the lung alveoli under this condition apparently plays an important part in the production of adrenalin pulmonary edema. On the basis of this mechanism the protective action of artificial respiration is explained. Stenosis of the trachea facilitates. the production of adrenalin pulmonary edema in rabbits whose vagi are intact. The intratracheal injection of adrenalin in vagotomized rabbits produces a temporary incoordination between the heart ventricles, visible on inspection, so that the left ventricle beats apparently half as fast as the right, causing hyperemia of the lungs and hemorrhages. Atropine injected intratracheally in vagotomized rabbits exerts a protective action against adrenalin pulmonary edema.
With the purpose of determining whether a diminished activity of the bone marrow could be brought about experimentally, plethora was produced in rabbits by means of repeated small transfusions of blood. Counts of the number of reticulated red cells in the circulating blood were made during the course of the experiments as an index to changes in the activity of the bone marrow. With the development of plethora, the number of reticulated cells in the blood decreased. In the majority of the plethoric animals, this diminution was extreme, and in some instances, reticulated cells practically disappeared from the blood. A comparison of the red bone marrow of these animals with that of normal controls revealed a marked reduction in the content of reticulated cells. After a number of transfusions, there occurred in some of the plethoric rabbits a sudden and marked drop in hemoglobin. The hemoglobin continued to fall until a severe grade of anemia was reached. This was followed by an extremely rapid regeneration accompanied by a striking rise in color index. During regeneration, the reticulated cells were enormously increased in number. Taken together, these facts show that the bone marrow is markedly influenced by plethora. The diminished number of reticulated cells observed, both in the circulating blood and in the marrow, would make it appear that a decided decrease in blood production occurs. The reduction in the number of these cells cannot be due to changes in the constitution of the red cells put out by the bone marrow, as a result of an increased quantity of hemoglobin in the body, because during regeneration from the above mentioned anemia, when the color index was very high, reticulated cells were still present in large numbers. That the activity of the bone marrow does actually diminish during plethora is further evidenced by the occurrence of the anemia. The most reasonable explanation of this phenomenon is that the recipient develops an immunity against the blood of the donors, which results in the destruction of the strange cells that are in circulation. In keeping with this conception is the appearance of isoagglutinins for the donors' red cells in the blood of the recipient, at about the time of the beginning fall in hemoglobin. The occurrence of anemia as a result of the destruction of the alien blood only would seem to be due to the circumstance that, during the period of plethora, blood production is greatly diminished; as a consequence, the blood cells proper to the recipient are gradually reduced in number and replaced by alien cells until the latter come to constitute the bulk of the animal's blood. In those rabbits developing anemia, the initial drop of hemoglobin from the plethoric level to the normal was constantly accompanied by a marked rise in the number of reticulated cells. This brought up a subsidiary problem for study. With the idea that the stimulation of the bone marrow might be due to the presence of an increased quantity of broken down blood, rabbits, were injected intravenously with large amounts of laked blood cells. The procedure had no evident effect on the blood picture. It was then found that simple blood removal from a plethoric animal which brought back the hemoglobin to the normal level, or even to a point somewhat above, sufficed to cause a marked increase in the number of reticulated cells. Although these findings are not conclusive, they suggest an explanation for the increased bone marrow activity accompanying the initial drop of hemoglobin in the plethoric rabbits; namely, that the organism had in some way adapted itself during the period of plethora to the presence of a greater amount of blood and that the result of blood loss in such an organism was a relative but not absolute anemia. The finding that the activity of the bone marrow can be depressed by the introduction of a large quantity of blood into the circulation accounts for the diminished bone marrow activity which sometimes occurs after transfusion in pernicious anemia. In such cases there is a marked drop in the number of reticulated cells and other evidence of bone marrow depression; the patient shows no benefit from transfusion or may grow rapidly worse. The cause of this depression is best explained on the basis that in severe instances of the disease where exhaustion of the bone marrow is imminent, the stimulus of the anemia is only just sufficient to keep the marrow functioning. A sudden lowering of this stimulus is brought about by the introduction of a large quantity of blood into the circulation, and the result is a fall in the activity of the bone marrow. It follows from this that in pernicious anemia with a feebly reacting bone marrow as indicated by the number of reticulated red cells, small transfusions are preferable to large ones.
The experiments reported above give evidence that in unresolved lobar pneumonia, the persistence of the exudate, followed by organization, depends upon the presence of serum in the exudate.
1. The growth .energy of the granulosa cells in the ovarian follicles of normal guinea pig ovaries varies with the size of the follcle, and follows a definite growth curve. The growth energy in small follicles is relatively low, then a gradual rise takes place with increase in size of the follicle up to a maximum which is reached when the follicle attains medium size. This ascending part of the curve is followed by a gradual fall in growth energy until in large follicles the proliferative power has fallen almost to the level of small follicles. Synchronously with maturity of the follicles there is an abrupt fall in growth energy to near the zero point. 2. There is a distinct localization of mitoses in the follicle. The large majority of mitoses is found in the perioval part. With increase in the growth energy which characterizes medium follicles, there is an increase in the proliferative power of the cells more distal to the egg, but still near the egg. We may therefore conclude on the basis of our observations and on the previous observations of Loeb, that the egg exerts a stimulus, which causes proliferation of the granulosa cells. 3. Under pathological conditions certain changes occur in the growth energy of the follicle: (a) Granulosa degeneration causes in the living cells a diminution in the proliferative power which is proportionate to the extent of the degeneration. (b) Hypotypical follicles have approximately the same or only slightly diminished proliferative power as normal ones, and thus their failure to grow is essentially due to disintegration of the granulosa cells.
The age incidence of focal tuberculous lesions of the lungs demonstrates that they have their origin in most instances in childhood. Focal lesions which heal have been found at all ages after the 2nd year of life, but in more than half of all individuals these lesions are acquired between the ages of 10 and 18 years. In the period between 18 and 30 years at least 85 per cent of all individuals have 'acquired focal tuberculous lesions. The occurrence of tuberculous infection in the lungs, in regional lymphatic nodes, or in some other organs of the body such as the gastrointestinal tract and its lymphatic system, is nearly universal but doubtless a few individuals escape. That focal tuberculous lesions of the lung are occasionally acquired during adult life is shown by the slight increase in the proportion of those with these lesions as age increases from 18 years to old age. Apical lesions of the lung make their appearance in later childhood and occur with increasing frequency from adolescence to old age (50 per cent). After the 2nd year of life focal tuberculous lesions occurring in situations other than the apices of the lungs tend to heal and after the 10th year focal lesions are almost invariably encapsulated and latent or healed. Fatal tuberculosis after the 10th year is with few exceptions apical in origin. The apices are not only more susceptible to infection in later life but once infected afford less resistance to the extension of the lesion. The present series of cases has furnished opportunity to observe the character of the apical lesion in lungs of individuals previously infected with tuberculosis. With one exception the apical lesion (in eight instances) has pursued a chronic course and, encapsulated by fibrous tissue, has remained limited to the extreme apex of the lung. In one instance in a woman with advanced malignant disease chronic pulmonary tuberculosis has been progressive. Tuberculosis of the apices in those who have previously acquired a focal tuberculous lesion has pursued a chronic course and in most instances has remained latent or has completely healed. A very small group of instances of fatal pulmonary tuberculosis suggests that apical lesions in those who have not undergone previous infection may assume an unusually severe character. One instance of apical tuberculosis unaccompanied by focal lesions and followed by tuberculosis of the thoracic duct and disseminated miliary tuberculosis has been especially significant. Apical tuberculosis unaccompanied by evidence of preexisting tuberculosis may be accompanied by tuberculosis of the regional lymphatic nodes, whereas apical tuberculosis in an individual with a preexistent focal tuberculous lesion is not followed by tuberculosis of adjacent lymphatic nodes. It is well known that tuberculosis in previously uninfected animals is followed by tuberculosis of adjacent lymphatic nodes, whereas a second infection fails to implicate the regional lymphatic nodes. This relation has been well illustrated by the lungs of a monkey which acquired in confinement acute tuberculous pneumonia limited to the left lung; the lymphatic nodes on this side were greatly enlarged and caseous. The following observations indicate that apical tuberculosis of adults is not the result of infantile tuberculosis but is caused by subsequent infection: (a) Apical tuberculosis does not have its highest incidence, in accordance with common belief, in early adult life when focal infections acquired in childhood are relatively fresh and active but is more common in later life when the focal lesions of childhood have in most instances completely healed. It is noteworthy that most of these apical lesions of later life pursue a chronic course and are discovered at autopsy in individuals who have died from other causes. (b) The well characterized lesions of tuberculosis acquired in childhood and found in adults with apical lesions are almost invariably calcified and healed. The apical lesion is in most instances relatively fresh and caseous whereas the focal pulmonary lesion and associated lesions of regional lymphatic nodes exhibit no evidence of activity. (c) In a large proportion of instances of associated focal and apical tuberculosis the focal lesion is in one lung, whereas the apical lesion is limited to the opposite apex. This relation affords no support to the view that tuberculous lesions may be transmitted to the apex by way of the lymphatics.
In the study of the action of non-antiseptic substances on the rate of cicatrization, the chief obstacle encountered is the facility with which wounds become reinfected under an aseptic dressing. At the beginning of Experiment 1 the wound was sterile. It was subjected to flushing with distilled water for 2 hours, then to flushing with 30 per cent sodium chloride solution for another 2 hours. During that time no special precaution was taken to sterilize the wound and the dressing was left intact until the following morning. It was then found that the wound contained from 30 to 50 bacteria per field. The following day, after the wound had been subjected to the same treatment, the number of bacteria had increased to 50 and 100 per field, and as an immediate consequence the surface of the wound increased from 12 to 12.6 sq. cm. in 2 days. The wound was then dressed antiseptically and was found to be sterile 3 days later. Reinfection again took place the following day in spite of antiseptic dressing with chloramine paste 4 parts per 1,000, which was applied for 20 hours. In Experiment 2 similar results were observed. After 2 days of flushing with distilled water, the number of bacteria had increased to 50 per field. The wound was thereupon sterilized, but new reinfection ensued a few days later. Another wound on the same patient became reinfected under the same conditions after 1 day of sterile dressing. In none of the patients could the wounds be kept in a sterile condition throughout the whole experiment. It was impossible to maintain the sterility of a wound under aseptic dressing. Dakin's solution was therefore injected every 4 hours, or less often, according to the degree of infection, or chloramine paste was applied during the night. If there were 3 or 4 bacteria per field, the experiment was discontinued in order that the wound might be sterilized again. The cicatrization and bacteriological curves of Experiment 4 show that by the application of chloramine paste a wound may be maintained in an appropriately bacteriological condition for carrying out an experiment. Nevertheless, in spite of the antiseptic precautions taken, it was necessary to interrupt this experiment on two occasions, on December 13 to 15 and on December 18 to 22, in order that a complete sterilization of the wound might be effected. When the sterilization was performed as soon as the bacteria were discovered, little retardation occurred in the process of cicatrization. Moreover, the reinfection from the skin was often due to fine bacilli which have but mild retarding action on the rate of healing. The use of at least six flushings in 2 hours with Dakin's solution or of 12 hours' dressing with chloramine paste 10 parts per 1,000, was necessary to keep the wound in a condition of surgical asepsis. The action of distilled water was studied in Experiments 1, 2, and 3. In Experiment 1 the wound was subjected to flushing with distilled water first for 2 hours, then 4 hours, and later for 8 hours per day. The wound was maintained in a condition of mild infection. No marked modification, either acceleration or retardation, was noted in the rate of repair during the period that the treatment was applied. From November 21 to 25 the wound was almost clean and the observed curve remained parallel to the calculated curve, showing that distilled water did not retard the rate of healing. In Experiment 2 the wound was subjected to uninterrupted flushing with distilled water, first for 2 and 8 hours, then for 24 hours. It was continued from November 24 to 30; viz., for 112 hours out of 120, without the occurrence of any marked modification of the course of healing. The bacteriological curve showed that from November 22 to 27 inclusive the wound was kept aseptic. The slight retardation which occurred afterwards was probably brought about by the infection. In Experiment 3 the wound was subjected to flushing with distilled water, first for 2, then for 4, 6, and 8 hours, a total of 20 hours in 4 days. From November 21 to 24 the wound remained surgically aseptic. No modification in the rate of healing occurred. The action of the hypertonic sodium chloride solution was studied in a similar way. In Experiment 4 the wound was flushed at first with 40 per cent sodium chloride solution, from December 4 to 9 for 12 hours a day, and from December 10 to 13 for 24 hours a day, making a total of 144 hours out of 240 hours. At the end of this time the surface area of the wound coincided exactly with the calculated area. Owing to reinfection the experiment was suspended. From December 24 to 29 the wound was kept in contact with 50 per cent sodium chloride solution for 54 hours, and after December 30 flushing with 80 per cent solution for 24 hours a day was resorted to. The total amount of time involved in the above treatments was 174 hours with 40 per cent solution, 72 hours with 50 per cent solution, and 120 hours with 80 per cent solution. On January 1, the surface measured 11 sq. cm. and the calculated surface was 11.3 sq. cm. On January 5 the. surface observed was 10 sq. cm. and the calculated surface was 9 sq. cm. It should be noticed that on January 5 the bacteria numbered 4 per field, which might account for the difference. In Experiment 5 the wound was flushed for 24 hours every day with 50 per cent sodium chloride solution from December 11 to 18, a total of 192 hours. From December 18 to 24 the wound was dressed with agar-agar cakes containing 40 per cent sodium chloride. The concentration was raised to 50 per cent from December 24 to 27. The cicatrization curve indicates only a slight retardation of the repair which can be attributed to infection when both cicatrization and infection curves are compared. The temporary acceleration on the 13th may have been due to the influence of the dressing, but as it did not occur again an experimental error is probably the cause of the change observed in the curve. In Experiment 6 two practically identical wounds at a distance of but a few centimeters from each other were located on the right thigh of Patient 721. The areas of the wounds were respectively 40 and 33 sq. cm. One of the wounds was flushed with distilled water only. The other was subjected to the action of 40 per cent sodium chloride solution. From December 20 to 25 both wounds were in a condition of surgical asepsis. However, the cicatrization curves show that in spite of the difference of treatment the rate of healing was not modified. The rate of healing of the wounds did not therefore apparently undergo any measurable modification under the influence of distilled water or hypertonic salt solution. It is well known that the osmotic changes of the medium have a marked influence on tissues deprived of circulation. But it seems that a tissue with normal circulation is protected by it against the changes of the osmotic pressure occurring at its surface. The above experiments show that apparently the conditions of the tissues of a wound are not modified by the changes of the osmotic pressure of the dressing. The beneficial effects of hypertonic sodium chloride solution on the sterilization of wounds and on the rate of healing recently described by various surgeons are possibly an illusion due to lack of precise technique.
1. Streptococci injected into the circulation of cats are quickly withdrawn and are found most numerously in the lung, less numerously in the liver and spleen, and in small numbers in the bone marrow, lymph nodes, muscle, and kidney. 2. The streptococci taken up by the lung are killed within 5 to 8 hours, although they remain visible in films for a number of days. In the liver they are killed less rapidly, and in the spleen a few may remain viable for a considerable period. 3. This bactericidal action may be demonstrated in pieces of excised lung but not in lung extracts, and is apparently dependent on the action of the living cell. 4. Streptococci injected into a susceptible animal, the rabbit, are also promptly removed from the circulation, but are distributed in different proportions, the liver and spleen absorbing almost as many as the lung, and the muscles also taking up an appreciable number. 5. As in the cat, the organisms taken up by the lung and liver of the living rabbit are promptly killed. Those which lodge in the muscles, however, multiply rapidly. 6. About the time that the streptococci have begun to develop in the muscles (4 to 8 hours after injection) the number in the blood stream begins to increase. 7. The increase in the blood stream is not due to exhaustion of the mechanism of their removal nor have these organisms acquired a resistance sufficient to maintain them in the blood stream of a normal animal. The septicemia, then, is probably the resuit of washing out of organisms from the infected tissues. 8. Attempts to immunize rabbits have been unsuccessful, but in certain treated animals the distribution of the organisms among the various organs approached that found in insusceptible animals; i.e., cats.
The total capacity, middle capacity, and residual air have been determined in twenty adult women suffering from pulmonary tuberculosis. The chest volumes have been determined in each case and the normal lung volumes calculated by means of the ratios worked out in Paper I and applied to thirty-one men in Paper II. The excursions of the diaphragm have been determined by fluoroscopy in all cases. Of eight patients with incipient tuberculosis, five had lung capacities like those of men in the same group; i.e., about normal total capacity, slightly increased residual air, and consequently somewhat decreased vital capacity. Three had considerably diminished total capacity. In these three patients, however, clinical abnormalities were found (extensive miliary tuberculosis, obstruction of bronchus, fixation of diaphragm in expiratory position). In twelve patients with moderately advanced and advanced tuberculosis, the results agreed with those found in men, the total capacity and vital capacity being decreased, while the residual air was practically normal.
1. Dakin's hypochlorite solution has the power of dissolving necrotic tissue, pus, and plasma clot in the concentration and reaction used clinically. 2. Chloramine-T and dichloramine-T do not exhibit this action. 3. The solvent action of Dakin's hypochlorite solution of the degree of alkalinity used clinically is due primarily to its hypochlorite content, but its slight alkalinity, while in itself without solvent action, enhances the effectiveness of the hypochlorite. 4. In the degree of alkalinity used clinically, the solvent action of hypochlorite is absent below about 0.2 per cent sodium hypochlorite concentration. 5. The hypochlorite concentration at which the solvent action ceases is lower the more alkaline the solution, and vice versa. 6. None of the antiseptics studied had demonstrable solvent action on blood clot.
In two instances of common colds, with no known contact with cases of pneumonia, Pneumococcus Type I was found to be the predominating organism, which strongly suggests that it was the etiological agent in these colds. If this is so, common colds of this type must be looked upon as a possible source of contagion in the development of lobar pneumonia due to the Type I pneumococcus.
Typical mitochondria can be found in the spinal ganglion cells of monkeys with experimental poliomyelitis, even when typical Nissl substance has disappeared, and mitochondria-like structures are found in the remaining protoplasm in the latest stage of neurophagocytosis.
The results of our experiments do not substantiate in full the theory of the power of selective action of Streptococcus viridans. A few strains showed a remarkable constancy in location and type of lesion, but these strains were greatly in the minority. The location of the lesions in animals seemed to bear no relation to the origin of the organism or to the lesions produced by it in the patient from which the strain was obtained. Streptococcus viridans, regardless of site of origin in the patient, produced most lesions in the heart and joints.
The subcutaneous injection of 1 or 2 mg. of morphine sulfate per kilo subcutaneously in dogs with a pancreatic deficiency, whose sugar tolerance is still good, produces a rise in the glycemia about four times greater than the same amount of morphine calls forth in normal dogs. As dogs with a pancreatic deficiency due to coagulation or partial resection of the gland may legitimately be considered in a prediabetic state, the inference is warranted that the morphine test may be of value in detecting a weakened carbohydrate metabolism in the human subject. The test could easily and without danger be carried out with the micro methods now available for the quantitative determination of blood sugar. The experimental facts described in this paper give additional corroboration to the view that the response of a normal and of a pathologically altered organism to the same drug in the same dosage may be quantitatively very different.
1. The total capacity, middle capacity, and residual air have been determined in 31 adult male patients suffering from tuberculosis of the lungs. 2. The chest volumes have been determined in each case and the normal lung volumes calculated by means of the ratios worked out in a previous paper. 3. In nine patients with incipient tuberculosis, the total lung volume was found within normal limits, whereas the vital capacity was diminished as a result of an increased residual air. The increase in the residual air was due to less complete expiration, caused partly by diminished movement of the diaphragm, partly by diminished compression of the chest wall. The diminished movement of the diaphragm was, as a rule, most marked on the most affected side. Whether these decreased movements are due to a reflex or to stiffness of the lung tissue we could not determine. The middle capacity was found practically normal. 4. In twenty-two cases of moderately advanced, and advanced tuberculosis, the total lung volume was in most cases markedly decreased. The vital capacity was substantially decreased, principally as a result of the diminished total capacity. The residual air was, as a rule, normal, although in a few cases an increase in residual air also contributed to the decrease in the vital capacity. The middle capacity, on which we do not want to put too much stress, was normal in some patients and considerably diminished in others.
Some hypothetical conclusions bearing on the evolution of cicatricial tissue can be suggested. The arterial circulation deposits in the wound chemical substances necessary for contraction of the wound and for epithelial proliferation. When the biologic process is not hindered by any special or severe bacterial infection this deposit is as regular as the circulation itself, and enables us to determine in advance the date of cicatrization. It even seems as though when the epidermization process is retarded by a slight infection the substances necessary for epidermization are stored up in the wound, and when the delay due to infection is removed the epithelium finds an accumulation of nutritive substances, and, so to speak, makes up the lost time. Moreover, when an infection entirely or partially stops epidermization, we have observed (Experiments 3, 4, and 5) that after the infection has disappeared the progress of new epidermization is much more rapid than normally; it even passes the calculated curve. The infection apparently destroyed only the epithelium and left in the wound the chemical substances which activate epidermization. The existence of these physical or chemical activating agents has been indicated again by two anatomical clinical facts. In treating a scalp wound in which there had been practically no epidermization for many months, we applied over the entire surface of the sterile wound dermo-epidermic grafts of fetal skin. After apparently taking, the grafts were absorbed and disappeared, but epidermization of the periphery of the wound, which hitherto had not progressed, took place abundantly, almost a hundred times as much as before. We believe that by mathematical measurements we can solve the problem of the action of various organic fluids on the cicatrization of wounds.
1. Thirty-one determinations of the total oxygen-combining power and the oxygen in the venous blood from vena mediana cubiti of sixteen resting patients are reported. 2. The difference between the total oxygen capacity of the hemoglobin and the oxygen in the venous blood, the oxygen unsaturation, is calculated. 3. In twelve patients with compensated heart lesions the unsaturation was found within normal limits, between 2.5 and 8 volume per cent. 4. In four patients with incompensated heart disease the values for the unsaturation were all above the normal limit, from 9.7 to 15.2 volume per cent. 5. A general discussion of the problem of interpreting the results is given. 6. A comparison is drawn between the oxygen consumption calculated from direct determination of the blood flow on a normal subject (the writer) and the oxygen unsaturation determined 4 years later on the same subject. A close agreement between the two series of values exists.
1. Forty-six determinations of the oxygen unsaturation, i.e., the difference between the venous oxygen and the total oxygen capacity of the hemoglobin, have been done in five patients with compensated circulatory disturbances. 2. Values within normal limits and near or below the normal average were found in four patients with regular pulse. 3. In one patient with mitral insufficiency and arrhythmia perpetua extremely varying values were encountered. Six determinations were made; in one instance the value was within normal limits, in five above, and in one of those even higher than in most cases of incompensated heart lesions. 4. A comparison is drawn between the directly determined oxygen unsaturation in these patients and the oxygen consumption calculated from previous experiments by the writer, where the blood flow was determined directly by the nitrous oxide method. A close parallelism is found.
1. A report is made of 103 determinations of the oxygen unsaturation of the venous blood of five patients with incompensated heart diseases. 2. Values for the oxygen unsaturation within normal limits were found only under two circumstances: (a) in a stage of full compensation, and (b) in a stage of incompensation where the symptoms were rapidly lessening. 3. Values above the upper normal extreme were met with under three circumstances: (a) during incompensation, (b) during compensation just before the clinical symptoms of incompensation had developed, and (c) at times in patients with auricular fibrillations in a condition of complete and stable compensation. 4. A comparison has been drawn between the directly found value for the oxygen unsatilration and the values for the oxygen consumption calculated from previous experiments by the writer on the blood flow (minute volume of the heart), in patients with similar clinical conditions. A close agreement existed. 5. It seems probable from our experience with patients under digitalis therapy that the oxygen unsaturation affords, an objective criterion of the positive effect of the therapy.
1. Increase in circulatory rate caused by hard exercise has no power to dislocate nucleated red cells from the bone marrow either in normal, in anemic, in hyperplastic, or in anemic and hyperplastic animals. 2. In anemic and hyperplastic animals pseudocrises of nucleated red cells can be produced at certain periods by hard exercise, but careful analysis leads inevitably to the conclusion that the increase in these cells is merely a more accurate expression of circulatory content at the time of the procedure. 3. Section of the vasomotor nerves to the four limbs with consequent dilatation of the marrow vessels and increased blood flow through the tissue does not result in the freeing of nucleated red cells from the bone marrow.
That a definite change in the reactivity of the skin takes place during the transition from infancy to childhood has been repeatedly noted. Rolly (5), working with a variety of bacterial toxins, found that infants did not react, but that reactions occurred with advancing age. Similarly Tenner (6), using Witte's peptone, colon bacilli, and tuberculin observed that at about the period that the skin of children became increasingly sensitive to tuberculin, a corresponding reactivity was manifest toward the other antigens. It seems possible to us that this phenomenon is related to the alteration in the ferments of the skin that takes place during the transition period. Thus while the protease of the adult type of skin causes a definite autolysis, that of the fetal skin does not, the synthetic potential evidently predominating. Of greater significance seems to be the fact that the skin of the young animal contains peptidase to a considerable amount, while the adult skin seems to be without this ferment activity. If we assume that the disintegration of the native protein of the antigen is essential in eliciting certain skin tests, it would seem probable that the splitting would be less apt to take place in the young skin in which the lytic effects of the ferments are relatively suppressed. On the other hand, the young skin, containing peptidase, would be able to digest rapidly any antigen consisting of partially hydrolyzed proteins-as tuberculin-and in this way detoxicate and remove the noxious material. From these considerations the undoubted alteration of the skin reactivity taking place after infancy seems definitely correlated with changes in the proteolytic ferments. In how far they enter into and alter the specific reactions cannot be determined from the limited data so far available. Of the other ferments, the lipases, as pointed out by Porter, are possibly of importance in the resistance of the skin to tuberculous infection. It will be observed from the table that the activity of these skin ferments is less manifest in their action as esterases, on ethyl butyrate, than on the neutral fats used, oleic oil and butter fat, in this way differing from the activity of the serum. The relative resistance of the skin to tuberculous infection can, however, hardly be due to the activity of the lipase alone, for it must be kept in mind that the lepra bacillus, also rich in lipoids, is enabled to proliferate well within the epithelial tissues.
On the basis of these findings we believe that we are Justified in saying that the immune serum of Weil's disease is capable of destroying the spirochetes found within the organs in man, with the exception of the kidneys, and that the action of the serum upon the spirochetes is spirochetolytic and spirocheticidal. The scattered spirochetes in the kidney, on the other hand, are resistant to the action of the immune serum. The spirochetes disappear almost completely from the organs during the convalescent stage of Well's disease, even when no serum has been administered. The only organ to be excepted is again the kidney, but no comparison between .serum-treated and non-serum-treated cases should be made in this respect, for spirochetes are found numerously in the kidneys even with serum treatment. The disappearance of the spirochetes from the organs and tissues in Well's disease seems to be not so marked with the subcutaneous serum treatment as with the intravenous method, but the manner of their disappearance is about the same.
Two series of experiments are described in which Rosenow's anti-poliomyelitic serum, so called, has been compared with the immune serum derived from monkeys which have convalesced or recovered from experimental poliomyelitis. The experiments consisted in introducing an active virus of polio-myelitis into the blood and of injecting the two kinds of serum into the cerebrospinal meninges according to the method of Flexner and Amoss. Under the conditions of the experiment, the control monkeys (a) receiving the virus intravenously alone do not develop paralysis, while those (b) receiving the virus intravenously and normal horse serum intraspinally develop paralysis. Moreover, the monkeys (c) receiving the virus intravenously and Rosenow's antipoliomyelitic serum intraspinally develop paralysis in the manner of those receiving normal horse serum intraspinally. The monkeys (d) which received the virus intravenously and the convalescent or immune monkey serum intraspinally alone did not develop paralysis. The Rosenow serum acts in the manner of normal horse serum; it promotes the passage of the virus of poliomyelitis from the blood into the nervous organs, and it does not protect from infection. We have found no evidence that Rosenow's serum under the conditions of the tests is effective therapeutically in monkeys or possesses antibodies of the same nature as those present in the blood of monkeys which have recovered from experimental poliomyelitis. Since the antibodies in convalescent poliomyelitic serum in man and the monkey are identical, it follows that any antibodies present in the Rosenow horse serum do not conform to those occurring in human convalescent serum.
Mice artificially immunized against a transplantable carcinoma, inoculated, and proved immune, may be again rendered susceptible to the same tumor by exposure to the x-rays. The immune animals which have not been treated with the x-rays preserve, to a large degree, their resistance to a second inoculation of the tumor in question.
For the neutralization of the virus of poliomyelitis by antibodies, active complement is not required. In carrying out immunity tests it is imperative to choose a virus of established grade of virulence and to make adequate control observations. The neutralizing substances pass from the blood of actively immune monkeys into the cerebrospinal fluid when the permeability of the meningeal-choroidal complex is increased by an aseptic inflammation such as that induced by an intraspinal injection of horse serum. The immunity bodies in effective neutralizing quantities can be detected in the cerebrospinal fluid as early as 12 hours and as late as 48 hours after the intraspinal injection of horse serum. Doubtless the passage continues as long as the inflammation persists. This ability of the neutralizing substances to pass from the blood into the cerebrospinal fluid under conditions of inflammation doubtless plays an important part in arresting the multiplication of the virus on which the cessation and restoration of the poliomyelitic processes depend. The widespread involvement in the inflammatory conditions of the meninges, choroid plexus, and substance of the nervous organs, accompanied by severe lesions of the blood vessels in the last structures especially, opens the way widely for the passage of antibodies into the cerebrospinal fluid, whence all parts of the nervous tissues are reached, and also, probably, for direct transudation into the affected parts of the spinal cord and brain. The neutralization of the virus on which the continuance of the active pathological process depends is thus readily accomplished. Under these circumstances the use of an alien specific immune serum to anticipate the action of the individual's own immunity products appears logical, while the employment of normal serum has no basis in experiment and would seem not to offer any therapeutic advantage whatever.
1. From a study of the agglutinins and protective power of the serum of 42 persons vaccinated against the pneumococcus, Types I, II, and III, it is demonstrated that a definite immune response has been secured to Types I and II by the dose of vaccine employed. Little evidence of response to Type III can be demonstrated by these methods, but this is of less significance in that in animals it is relatively difficult to secure antibodies against this strain in the serum, even though a considerable degree of active immunity may have been produced in the vaccinated animal. 2. The degree of response to the vaccination appears to be dependent upon the total dosage of each type of pneumococcus administered. While some response may be elicited by 2(1/2) billion cocci of each type, a much more constant and greater response follows 13 billion. 3. In subcutaneous administration the manner in which the total dosage is divided, whether given in a single large dose, in seven small daily doses, or in three to five moderate doses at 3 to 7 day intervals, seems to have little influence upon the degree of immune response, provided the total dosage is the same. 4. The local and general toxic reaction varies greatly in different individuals. The smaller the individual doses, the fewer are the severe reactions. This makes it desirable to divide the total dosage into as many inoculations as circumstances make practicable. 5. At Camp Upton 12,519 men have been vaccinated against Pneumococcus Types I, II, and III. Three or four doses were given at intervals of 5 to 7 days with a total dosage of 6 to 9 billion of Types I and II and 4(1/2) to 6 billion of Type III. 6. During the 10 weeks that have elapsed since the vaccination, no cases of pneumonia of these three types have occurred among the men who had received two or more injections of vaccine. 7. In a control of approximately 20,000 men there were twenty-six cases of Pneumococcus Types I, II, and III pneumonias during the same period. 8. The incidence of Pneumococcus Type IV pneumonia and streptococcus pneumonia was much less among the vaccinated troops than among the unvaccinated. No explanation has been advanced for this difference. 9. Small sterile infiltrations disappearing spontaneously occasionally follow the injection of large doses of pneumococcus vaccine and appear to be an expression of cutaneous hypersusceptibility. 10. The persons who develop these lesions exhibit local reactions to each dose of vaccine. They also give abnormally marked reactions to intradermal injections of pneumotoxin. They do not, however, exhibit anything notable in the agglutinative or protective powers of their sera after vaccination. Whereas the immune response is characteristically specific for the type of pneumococcus, this reaction is not specific for any type. We have found no evidence that Type III is more prone to elicit these severe local reactions than are Types I and II. 11. Prophylactic vaccination against pneumococcus of Types I, II, and III is practical and apparently gives protection against pneumonia produced by these types. It remains to be determined how long this immunity persists.
The elimination of the foreign complement and corpuscles from the test for the serodiagnosis of syphilis has been attempted, and the results so far obtained are very satisfactory. Instead of using guinea pig complement, fresh human serum was utilized for the source of complement for the production of hemolysis upon the human corpuscles in the presence of an adequate amount of the specific anti-human amboceptor (prepared in rabbits). Usually 0.1 cc. of fresh human serum contains enough complement to hemolyze 1 cc. of a 1 per cent suspension of human corpuscles, but the amount of anti-human amboceptor required in this combination is about five to seven times that necessary when guinea pig complement (0.04 cc.) is used. It has also been shown that when a given human serum contains insufficient complement, an adequate quantity (0.1 cc. is usually enough) of another fresh negative serum may be added to supplement it. However, one rarely encounters this group of sera. Inactivated human sera can also be examined by utilizing human complement from another source (the serum must be fresh, active, and negative). The only drawback to the present method is the comparatively large amount of anti-human hemolytic amboceptor required. It is estimated that 30 to 40 cc. of the anti-human hemolytic immune serum, from one rabbit, of high potency-say 0.005 cc.-would be enough to examine about 3,000 to 4,000 cases (0.01 cc. for each case), whereas if guinea pig complement were used the same amount would cover about 15,000 tests (0.002 cc. for each case). In a large hospital or in the Army there should be no difficulty in preparing any amount of the anti-human hemolytic amboceptor. For example, material for 100,000 tests could be prepared within 1 month in less than 100 rabbits. The amboceptor serum can be used in the fluid state, or, if the titer is high, impregnated into filter papers. Special attention should be called to the fact that to obtain a powerful anti-human hemolytic amboceptor five to six intraperitoneal injections of corpuscles, thoroughly washed (until there is no trace of serum in the supernatant fluid), in doses of 5, 7, 10, 10, 10, and possibly another 10 cc. of the concentrated suspension (restored to the. original volume of the blood) are required. The bleeding may be done by the 9th or 10th day. The animals may be kept after bleeding for the production of more amboceptor by subsequent injections of the washed corpuscles. Finally, it should be emphasized that only the acetone-insoluble fraction of tissue lipoids of required standards (Noguchi) should be used when utilizing the human complement in the fixation test.
The purpose of the present investigation was to determine a practical method of vaccination against bacillary dysentery. It has been emphasized that the toxicity of the dysentery group of organisms, especially that of the Shiga bacillus, is such as not to permit of their employment in simple saline or aqueous suspensions. If, on the other hand, their toxicity is removed by the addition of certain chemicals, the antigen of the bacilli is so changed as not to be suitable for immunization purposes. The toxicity of the bacilli can also be diminished by the addition of immune serum. There is no essential difference in the result whether unmodified serum is used or that modified by Gibson's method. The use of serum with vaccines cannot be recommended, in spite of the relative non-toxicity of such mixtures. The specific immunity response is reduced, while the parenteral injection of horse serum in large groups of men is objectionable because of the serum sensitization which it produces. It has been shown that a certain vegetable oil, almond oil, (and this statement may apply to a number of non-irritating, absorbable oils) is capable of overcoming many of these disadvantages. The oil acts as a passive agent in merely suspending the bacteria without altering their properties. The slow absorption of the suspended bacteria from this vehicle mitigates the toxic effects of the dysentery bacilli. At the same time it does not interfere with the immunity response-antibacterial and antitoxic. If the absorption is too slow, however, as in the instances in which lanolin was added, less satisfactory results follow. The proper rate of absorption is as important a factor as the proper vegetable oil. The latter condition has been emphasized in the consideration of the effects of an objectionable olive oil. The neutralization of the oil should be complete. F. G. S. and J. W. S. suffered from severe local reactions, the results of the local deposition of soaps, which are difficult of absorption. As a result of the slow absorption of the dysentery bacilli from the oily suspension only slight local and general reactions follow, and it is possible to give at one time and in a single dose a sufficient number of the killed dysentery bacilli to incite a high degree of immunity. The precise series of events following the injection of the oily vaccine are: During the 1st day, an erythematous area develops at the site of injection, which is not especially painful. There may be a slight systemic reaction, consisting in headache and slight chilliness. After 24, sometimes after 48 hours, an induration appears at the site of injection, varying from 2 to 4 cm. in diameter, which remains unchanged for a few days, then begins to recede, complete absorption requiring from 1 to 3 weeks. The induration remains localized and has no tendency to break down. It causes no inconvenience. During the period of absorption the organism of the host continually receives antigen. The rule of immunology is that while antigen is circulating the antibodies are usually not demonstrable; it is only after all the antigen disappears that the antibodies appear in greatest concentration. Since the vaccine is slowly absorbed, the reasons for the delayed appearance of antibodies, as well as their persistence, become obvious.
Discharges of blood per rectum, associated with oocysts of coccidia, were observed occurring in young calves during the warmer season of the year. In a small percentage of the cases death was probably due directly to the coccidiosis. Although the disease, known as red dysentery in Switzerland, may have existed in this country for some time, there seems to have been no knowledge of its existence and no reports of it have thus far been published. The coccidia have been artificially cultivated and shown to produce four spores. Two oocysts of quite different dimensions and having minor differential characters were encountered in the same animal in several instances. The invasion of the epithelium of the small intestine was slight. The chief seat of the parasitism was the large intestine. The lesions following the loss of epithelium were superficial hemorrhages and filling up of the denuded tubules with polymorphonuclear leukocytes.
It seems clearly established that non-hemolytic streptococci are responsible for a considerable number of cases of bovine mastitis. Of the 81 animals examined, 31 were suffering from infections of this type. The lesions produced in invaded quarters varied from an involvement of only the lining epithelium of the large milk ducts to severe degeneration and necrosis of the secreting epithelium. In one instance a considerable portion of the glandular elements had been replaced with connective tissue. The streptococci fall into two groups when their action on the various carbohydrates is considered. Thirty-four strains fermented dextrose, lactose, saccharose, maltose, and salicin; five others attacked the first four sugars but failed to produce acid in salicin. All mastitis streptococci failed to act upon raffinose, inulin, or mannite. One species isolated from a mammary abscess produced acid in all the carbohydrates. All the strains were agglutinated with an antiserum prepared from one typical strain. The agglutination titer varied over wide limits, although all the streptococci were agglutinated at a dilution of 1:500. None of the strains inoculated proved pathogenic for rabbits. A pig fed on the milk from two typical cases of mastitis remained well.
1. The hemolytic variety of streptococcus is homogeneous, consisting of members that are nearly identical. 2. This homogeneity is most strikingly displayed in the behavior of these streptococci in the complement fixation reaction, all the strains studied reacting in a nearly identical way with all the antisera.
1. The relation between hemolytic and non-hemolytic streptococci is orderly and arises from the fact that the former variety is unique while the latter is heterogeneous. 2. Analogous considerations of the classification, distribution, and pathogenicity of the streptococcus group and the pneumococcus and colon-typhoid groups show a definite parallelism. 3. These considerations suggest that unique varieties of bacteria associated with man are the more highly invasive, while the heterogeneous varieties are more saprophytic.
Complete obstruction of the ureter causes atrophy of the renal parenchyma, especially marked in the portions lateral to the renal sinus. The longer the duration of the obstruction, the greater is the degree of atrophy. If the obstruction is removed within 2 weeks the kidney may regain its normal structure except for a varying amount of atrophy in the lateral portions. Kidneys obstructed for 2 weeks or less may regain their normal function, as measured by the phthalein test. The longer the period of obstruction, the slower is the rate of recovery. A hydronephrosis of 7 days' duration required 40 days, and one of 14 days' duration required 152 days to recover normal function.
The acute intoxication following an injection of a toxic proteose is usually associated with a large increase (40 per cent or more) in the non-protein nitrogen of the blood. This increase is found chiefly in the blood urea nitrogen, but the amino and peptide nitrogens also may show small increases. The changes observed in the blood non-protein nitrogen are identical with those which follow the feeding of large amounts of meat (8). These facts indicate that the proteose intoxication causes an abnormally rapid autodigestion of tissue proteins, but that the nitrogenous end-products are, in chief part at least, the same that result from normal catabolism of food proteins. There is no evidence that the autolytic products play any part in causing the intoxication. The possibility of such a part and a resultant vicious circle is not excluded, but from the available facts the autolysis appears more as a result rather than cause of the intoxication. It appears possible that in disease or intoxication tissue catabolism may be enormously accelerated and yet yield the end-products of normal protein metabolism.
Sterile abscess, pleuritis, and pancreatitis give a clinical reaction in the experimental animal very like the same acute inflammatory processes due to bacterial activity, provided the bacterial agents are limited to the initial location. The curve of urinary nitrogen excretion in the fasting dog shows the same precipitous and sustained rise in sterile and bacterial inflammatory reactions. This indicates that the same type of protein injury and autolysis in the body is produced by the sterile inflammatory reaction as by the bacterial reaction. It is assumed that the primary effect of the chemical agent or of the bacterial growth in the tissues is local cell injury or necrosis. This injured cell protoplasm undergoes prompt autolysis with escape of toxic protein split products. These toxic protein split products may be, in part at least, of the proteose group and are absorbed into the circulation, producing the familiar general reaction. The injury of body protein is obvious from the great increase in elimination of nitrogen in the urine and appears to be the same in sterile and in bacterial inflammation. The injurious agent in the sterile inflammation must be derived from the host protein, and we may assume with safety that much of the injurious material emanating from a septic inflammation must come from the host protein rather than from the bacteria. Acute sterile pancreatitis is one of the purest examples of an acute non-specific reaction where the intensity of the host's intoxication may reach a maximum in 12 to 24 hours. We believe that fundamentally this reaction is very similar to that observed after the production of a sterile abscess or pleurisy. Non-specific intoxication must account for the sterile reactions described above. Septic inflammations show the same acute reaction and injury of body protein. The deduction is obvious-that a great part, at least, of the reaction in septic inflammation is truly non-specific and results from the primary injury of the host's protein and cell autolysis.
Sterile abscess formation in the dog is accompanied by a large increase in output of urinary nitrogen and also by a small but definite increase in the blood non-protein nitrogen. All this nitrogenous material of course is derived from body protein injury and autolysis. Septic inflammation in the dog (pleurisy, pneumonia, peritonitis, etc.) likewise shows a distinct rise in the blood non-protein nitrogen. This rise is not often so great as that frequently observed in the intoxication of intestinal obstruction. Many acute infections in man (septicemia, peritonitis, pneumonia, etc.) show a definite rise in the non-protein nitrogen and urea nitrogen of the blood; some cases show a very great rise above normal (over 100 mg. of non-protein nitrogen per 100 cc. of blood). There may be no anatomical change in the kidney beyond the familiar picture of cloudy swelling. This does not exclude the possibility of some transient functional derangement of the kidney epithelium. Certain obscure intoxications in man may show a considerable rise in the non-protein nitrogen of the blood, indicating a large amount of protein disintegration. These findings must be taken into account in any clinical analysis and interpretation of high non-protein nitrogen of the blood in pathological conditions.
Minute amounts of photosynthesis in marine plants can be accurately measured by adding a little phenolphthalein to the sea water, and observing changes in the color of the indicator. In the case of fresh water aquatics bicarbonates are added. By this method it is found that Ulva which has been kept in the dark begins photosynthesis as soon as it is exposed to sunlight and that the rate steadily increases until a constant speed is attained. This may be explained by assuming that sunlight decomposes a substance whose products either catalyze photosynthesis or enter directly into the reaction. Quantitative theories are developed in order to account for the facts.
The tonus of the muscles of heliotropic insects is due chiefly to the action of light; it is markedly decreased in the dark. Each eye controls the tonus of a different group of muscles on both sides of the body. Different areas of each eye likewise are related to the tonus of different muscle groups, and the relationship is entirely analogous to that of the otic labyrinth of vertebrates. Asymmetrical conditions of muscle tension are produced by any procedure which establishes an unequal photochemical reaction in the two eyes, by difference in illumination, by partial or complete blackening of one eye, or establishing unequal sensitiveness in the two eyes. The unbalanced condition of muscle tonus expresses itself in unusual postures of the resting insects, and in movements in forced paths-circus motions when one eye has been blackened. These reactions vary directly with the intensity of the illumination, as shown not only by the variation in diameters of the circles, but also by the reactions of the insects on vertical surfaces and on the turntable. The relation of the results of these experiments to the problem of heliotropic orientation is too obvious to require detailed discussion, which could only lead to a repetition of the description of the mechanism f heliotropism which Loeb has so clearly expounded. The experiments are so completely in accordance with Loeb's muscle tension theory of heliotropism, that they are tantamount to a complete proof of it.
The experimental evidence had made clear that some substance is produced in the testis of the male Sebright that suppresses in him the development of the secondary sexual plumage of the cock of his species. The detection in his testis of lutear cells like those in hens makes the conclusion highly probable that it is these cells that cause the suppression of cock-feathering in both the Sebright male and in hens of all fowls. Genetic work by Morgan had shown that one or two Mendelian factor-differences are responsible for hen-feathering in the Sebright. These factor-differences produce their effects through the testes. The presence of these genetic factors, we now see, causes the testes of the Sebright to produce a kind of secretory cell that is ordinarily only produced in the female, or possibly to a slight extent in young males (Boring), or in numbers insufficient to suppress the male plumage in the testes of some ordinary cock birds (Reeves).
An apparatus is described which makes it possible to measure rapidly and accurately small amounts of CO(2) given off by organisms of all kinds. The apparatus can also be used to measure photosynthesis.
From the facts stated in this paper it is evident that the thymus gland of mammals contains a substance which is capable of producing tetany when fed to the larvae of certain species of salamanders (Ambystoma opacum and Ambystoma maculatum). As long as the larvae have not developed their own thymus glands, they are able, by means of some mechanism, to counterbalance the tetanic action of the thymus substance introduced in their food. When, however, the secretion from their own thymus glands is added to the thymus material introduced with the food, this mechanism of preventing tetany becomes inadequate and tetany ensues. In the larva of a third species of salamander, Ambystoma tigrinum, this mechanism will prevent tetany even when the larvae are fed on thymus. In mammals the parathyroids are known to prevent tetany and are supposed either to absorb the tetany-producing substance and thus prevent its action or to change it into another non-toxic substance. It is at least probable that in the amphibians the parathyroids play the same rle. Larvae of anuran amphibians, which develop their parathyroids soon after hatching, never show tetanic convulsions if they are fed on thymus, but in certain species of salamanders, whose parathyroids develop only during metamorphosis, the larvae invariably have tetanic convulsions upon thymus feeding, while the metamorphosed animals never show tetany. But in addition to the parathyroids the salamanders must possess still another mechanism which during the larval period inhibits the production of tetany by the animal's own thymus glands. In the larvae of Ambystoma opacum and Ambystoma maculatum this mechanism is sufficient only to prevent tetany from the animal's own thymus, while in the larvae of Ambystoma tigrinum it is capable of preventing tetany even when the larvae are fed with thymus. If the thymus is the organ by whose action tetany is produced, we can understand why tetany in human beings occurs far more frequently in children than in adults, since in the latter the thymus gland is replaced, at least to a great extent, by connective tissue. The relation of thymus to tetany may also possibly explain the occurrence of tetany during pregnancy; while the parathyroids of the mother may be sufficient to prevent tetany from her largely atrophied thymus, they may not be sufficient to prevent tetany from the excess of thymus substance furnished by the fetus to the blood of the mother.
The effect of the thymus gland in producing tetany is due to a specific tetany toxin produced by and contained in the thymus, and the thymus gland must be added to the group of glands for which the function of internal secretion has been demonstrated.
1. It has been shown in this paper that while non-ionized gelatin may exist in gelatin solutions on both sides of the isoelectric point (which lies for gelatin at a hydrogen ion concentration of C(H) = 2.10(-5) or pH = 4.7), gelatin, when it ionizes, can only exist as an anion on the less acid side of its isoelectric point (pH > 4.7), as a cation only on the more acid side of its isoelectric point (pH < 4.7). At the isoelectric point gelatin can dissociate practically neither as anion nor as cation. 2. When gelatin has been transformed into sodium gelatinate by treating it for some time with M/32 NaOH, and when it is subsequently treated with HCl, the gelatin shows on the more acid side of the isoelectric point effects of the acid treatment only; while the effects of the alkali treatment disappear completely, showing that the negative gelatin ions formed by the previous treatment with alkali can no longer exist in a solution with a pH < 4.7. When gelatin is first treated with acid and afterwards with alkali on the alkaline side of the isoelectric point only the effects of the alkali treatment are noticeable. 3. On the acid side of the isoelectric point amphoteric electrolytes can only combine with the anions of neutral salts, on the less acid side of their isoelectric point only with cations; and at the isoelectric point neither with the anion nor cation of a neutral salt. This harmonizes with the statement made in the first paragraph, and the experimental results on the effect of neutral salts on gelatin published in the writer's previous papers. 4. The reason for this influence of the hydrogen ion concentration on the stability of the two forms of ionization possible for an amphoteric electrolyte is at present unknown. We might think of the possibility of changes in the configuration or constitution of the gelatin molecule whereby ionized gelatin can exist only as an anion on the alkaline side and as a cation on the acid side of its isoelectric point. 5. The literature of colloid chemistry contains numerous statements which if true would mean that the anions of neutral salts act on gelatin on the alkaline side of the isoelectric point, e.g. the alleged effect of the Hofmeister series of anions on the swelling and osmotic pressure of common gelatin in neutral solutions, and the statement that both ions of a neutral salt influence a protein simultaneously. The writer has shown in previous publications that these statements are contrary to fact and based on erroneous methods of work. Our present paper shows that these claims of colloid chemists are also theoretically impossible. 6. In addition to other physical properties the conductivity of gelatin previously treated with acids has been investigated and plotted, and it was found that this conductivity is a minimum in the region of the isoelectric point, thus confirming the conclusion that gelatin can apparently not exist in ionized condition at that point. The conductivity rises on either side of the isoelectric point, but not symmetrically for reasons given in the paper. It is shown that the curves for osmotic pressure, viscosity, swelling, and alcohol number run parallel to the curve of the conductivity of gelatin when the gelatin has been treated with acid, supporting the view that these physical properties are in this case mainly or exclusively a function of the degree of ionization of the gelatin or gelatin salt formed. It is pointed out, however, that certain constitutional factors, e.g. the valency of the ion in combination with the gelatin, may alter the physical properties of the gelatin (osmotic pressure, etc.) without apparently altering its conductivity. This point is still under investigation and will be further discussed in a following publication. 7. It is shown that the isoelectric point of an amphoteric electrolyte is not only a point where the physical properties of an ampholyte experience a sharp drop and become a minimum, but that it is also a turning point for the mode of chemical reactions of the ampholyte. It may turn out that this chemical influence of the isoelectric point upon life phenomena overshadows its physical influence. 8. These experiments suggest that the theory of amphoteric colloids is in its general features identical with the theory of inorganic hydroxides (e.g. aluminum hydroxide), whose behavior is adequately understood on the basis of the laws of general chemistry.
1. The course of such processes as hemolysis is very largely dependent upon variations in resistance among the different individuals, and secondarily upon the course of the fundamental reaction. 2. The fundamental reaction may be either a simple process, or the expression of a complex series of changes whose rate is at all times governed by that of the slowest of the series. This might perhaps be regarded as another expression of the so called "Law of the minimum." 3. Unnatural assumptions would be requisite for the explanation of a resemblance between the course of such processes in general and that of a monomolecular reaction. 4. The supposition that such a general resemblance exists is not supported by the available evidence. 5. The independent determination of either the nature of the fundamental reaction, or the type of the variation curve for the particular case under observation, will further our knowledge of the nature of such processes and lead to a far deeper insight into the nature and reactions of living matter.
1. A method is given which allows us to measure the influence of the mass of a leaf upon the quantity of shoots regenerated in an isolated piece of stem. This method consists in isolating a piece of stem with only two leaves left at the basal node and then splitting the stem lengthwise so that each half has one basal leaf. By leaving one leaf intact while the size of the sister leaf is reduced, the influence of the mass of the leaf upon the quantity of shoots regenerated by the stem can be measured. 2. This method has yielded the result that the mass of shoots regenerated at the apex of such a piece of stem increases under equal conditions and in equal time with the mass of the leaf, and is approximately proportional to the mass of the leaf. 3. Such an influence of the mass of the leaf upon the mass of shoots produced by the stem is only intelligible on the assumption that the growth of the regenerating shoot occurs at the expense of material furnished by the basal leaf. 4. This assumption is supported by two facts: first, that in the dark this influence of the leaf disappears more or less completely; and, second, that a leaf attached to the base of a regenerating stem after some time weighs markedly less than does a sister leaf completely detached from the stem, but otherwise under equal conditions. 5. This latter fact that a leaf when attached to the base of an excised piece of stem wilts more rapidly than when completely isolated is the reason that the proportionality between mass of a basal leaf and mass of shoot regenerated at the apex of an isolated piece of stem cannot always be demonstrated with the same degree of accuracy as the proportionality between the mass of completely isolated leaves and the mass of shoots they produce. 6. The material furnished by the leaf to the stem is not restricted to water but includes also the solutes, since not only the fresh weight but also the dry weight of the shoot regenerated by a piece of stem increases with the mass of the leaf attached to the base of the stem; and since not only the water contents but the dry weight of a leaf attached to the base of an excised piece of stem diminish when compared with the dry weight of a completely detached sister leaf. 7. The mass of shoots produced by an isolated piece of stem without leaf is small and almost negligible compared with the mass of shoots produced by the same piece of stem when a leaf of sufficient mass is attached to the base of the stem.
Two cases have been described, that of the marine planarian Bdelloura and that of the starfish Asterias forbesii, in which strychnine reverses reciprocal inhibition. These facts indicate that the nervous systems of these invertebrates function in a manner similar to those of the earthworm and vertebrates. Moreover, it would seem that strychnine acts upon some chemical component of the neuron which is always present in synaptic structures but which also occurs in the simpler neurons of lower forms. The fact that strychnine is without this characteristic effect on such forms as medusa and sea anemone, indicates that the nervous systems of the starfish and planarian have chemical affinities with the vertebrates which the coelenterates do not possess.
1. Ciona possesses two means of responding to an increase in the intensity of illumination. One is by means of a local reaction; the other is by a retraction reflex of the body as a whole. 2. The "ocelli" are not photoreceptors. The photosensitive area is in the intersiphonal region containing the neural mass. This area contains no pigment. 3. The reaction time to light is composed of a sensitization period during which Ciona must be exposed to the light, and of a latent period during which it need not be illuminated in order to react to the stimulus received during the sensitization period. 4. The duration of the reaction time varies inversely as the intensity. Analysis shows the latent period to be constant. The relation between the sensitization period and the intensity follows the Bunsen-Roscoe rule. 5. During dark adaptation the reaction time is at first large, then it decreases until a constant minimum is reached. 6. A photochemical system consisting of a reversible reaction is suggested in order to account for the phenomena observed. This system includes a photosensitive substance and its precursor, the dynamics of the reaction following closely the peculiarities of the photosensitivity of Ciona. 7. It is shown that in order to produce a reaction, a constant ratio must be reached between the amount of sensitive substance broken down by the stimulus and the amount previously broken down. 8. From the chemical system suggested certain experimental predictions were made. The actual experiments verified these predictions exactly. 9. The results obtained with regularly repeated stimulation not only fail to show any basis for a learning process or for the presence of a "higher behavior," but follow the requirements of the photochemical system suggested before.
The blood of the horseshoe crab (Limulus) absorbs oxygen and turns blue when shaken in air. In the presence of certain organisms which consume oxygen it is quickly decolorized. By measuring the time required for the change of color the rate of consumption of oxygen may be determined.
A series of investigations on respiration with improved quantitative methods has been commenced. The first of these are here described. They show that when anesthetics are employed in sufficient concentration to produce any result, plants show a rise in the rate of respiration which is followed by a fall. In the animals studied, the rise (found in higher concentrations only) was preceded by a temporary fall which is not entirely due to lowering of muscular activity or tonus. In lower concentrations the effect on animals was merely a decrease of respiration. The results of all the investigations are opposed to the theory of Verworn.
1. In concentrations which are high enough to produce any effect, formaldehyde, ether, and acetone cause an increase, followed by a decrease, in the rate of respiration. 2. 3.65 per cent ether, which causes an increase with certain cultures, produces only a decrease with others. 3. The reaction producing an increase in the respiration with 7.3 per cent ether is a reversible process, while the reaction producing the decrease is not reversible. 4. 0.5 per cent caffeine produces only a decrease in respiration while a saturated solution causes an increase, which is followed by a decrease.
1. In all the concentrations of ether studied (from 0.037 to 7.3 per cent) there is an increase in the rate of respiration of Bacillus subtilis followed by a decrease. 2. In 7.3 per cent ether in tap water there is an extraordinary increase in the output of CO(2) (amounting to 50 times the normal). This does not occur when 0.85 per cent NaCl is added, which indicates antagonism between ether and NaCl. 3. Ether is toxic in low concentrations (0.037 to 1.1 per cent) and high concentrations (3.65 to 7.3 per cent) but in intermediate concentrations (1.1 to 3.65 per cent) stimulates growth.
These experiments show that 7.3 and 3.65 per cent ether solutions cause an increase in respiration followed by a decrease. The results agree with those of Haas on Laminaria, of Gustafson on higher fungi, and of Mrs. Brooks on bacteria. They do not agree with the theory of Verworn that anesthesia is a kind of asphyxia and that it decreases respiration.
1. The experiments on frog tadpoles show that with 0.15, 0.37, and 0.55 per cent ether solutions there is a decrease in CO(2) output. The effect is reversible. With these concentrations the breathing movements and body movements remained normal during the experiment. In 3.65 and 7.3 per cent ether there is a decrease of respiration followed by an increase which in turn is followed by a decrease. The increase may reach about three times the normal rate. The increase in the CO(2) output is accompanied by the peeling of the skin. The effect is irreversible. 2. Experiments on an aquatic insect, Dineutes assimilis Aube, show that in 7.3 per cent ether there is a decrease followed by an increase which in turn is followed by a decrease. There is no apparent disintegration of structures in the organism accompanying the increase. The effect is irreversible. 3. The experiments on frog eggs with 7.3 per cent ether show a result similar to that found in aquatic insects. 4. Experiments on Fundulus embryos show that with 0.73 per cent ether there is a reversible decrease in the rate of CO(2) production. In 3.65 per cent ether there is a temporary decrease followed by an increase, after which the rate begins to fall off. In 7.3 per cent ether there is an immediate increase amounting to 307 per cent which is followed by a decrease. The increase in the 3.65 and 7.3 per cent ether is accompanied by irreversible changes leading to death. The decrease found in 0.73 per cent ether is not sufficient to cause narcosis, as is shown by experiments on which the same decrease is produced by lowering the temperature. 5. These experiments show that narcosis is not due to asphyxia. The action of anesthetics is due to some other cause than the effect on respiration. There is a difference between the animals studied and the plants described in this series of articles, since in animals the increase in the CO(2) output is accompanied by irreversible changes leading to death, while this is not necessarily the case in plants. The reversible (narcotic) action of ether on the animals studied was accompanied by a decrease in the carbon dioxide output; in plants this is not ordinarily the case. These facts are of considerable interest, but their interpretation must be left to future investigation.
